Nevada, session 83, SB425.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 9, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. “Office” means the State Office of Health Care
Workforce and Licensing established in the Division by section 6
of this act.
Sec. 3. As used in NRS 223.631 to 223.639, inclusive, and
sections 3 to 9, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 4 and 5 of this
act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. “Administrator” means the Administrator of the
Division.
Sec. 5. “Division” means the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department.
Sec. 6. 1. The State Office of Health Care Workforce and
Licensing is hereby established in the Division.
2. The Administrator shall appoint the Director of the Office.
The Director of the Office must not hold a license, certificate or
registration issued pursuant to chapter 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or
641D of NRS.
3. The Director of the Office may not apply for any license,
certificate or registration pursuant to chapter 641, 641A, 641B,
641C or 641D of NRS while serving as Director of the Office or
for 5 years after leaving that office. Any application submitted in
violation of this section and any license, certificate or registration
issued upon the approval of such an application are void.
4. The Director of the Office shall devote his or her entire
time and attention to the business of the Office and shall not
engage in any other gainful employment or occupation.
5. The Director of the Office is in the unclassified service of
the State and serves at the pleasure of the Administrator.
Sec. 7. The Director of the Office shall:
1. Advise the Director of the Department and the
Administrator on matters relating to the health care workforce in
this State.
2. Work in coordination with the Department and the
Division to establish criteria and goals for the development and
diversification of the health care workforce in this State.
3. As directed by the Administrator, identify, recommend and
carry out policies related to the health care workforce in this State.
4. Report periodically to the Administrator concerning the
administration of the policies and programs of the Office.
-
*SB425*

– 5 –
5. Provide support to the Advisory Council on Graduate
Medical Education created by NRS 223.633 and implement the
Graduate Medical Education Grant Program established pursuant
to NRS 223.637.
6. Recommend to the Legislature the enactment, amendment
or repeal of statutes as necessary to:
(a) Support an adequate health care workforce to meet the
demand of consumers for behavioral health services and other
health services;
(b) Prevent harm to the health, safety and financial welfare of
the public; and
(c) Remove requirements relating to providers of health care
that are no longer needed to protect the public or are not effective
at improving the delivery of behavioral health services and other
health services.
7. Administer such grants as are provided by legislative
appropriation.
8. Consult with and, within the limits of available resources,
provide assistance to the State Treasurer, the Board of Regents of
the University of Nevada, the University of Nevada School of
Medicine, the Nevada Office of Rural Health, the Area Health
Education Center Program and the Medical Education Council of
Nevada when requested pursuant to NRS 226.464, 396.898,
396.902, 396.905, 396.906, 396.907 or 396.908.
9. Carry out:
(a) The programs established by NRS 439A.111 to 439A.126,
inclusive, for collecting information from certain providers of
health care; and
(b) The Physician Visa Waiver Program established by NRS
439A.130 to 439A.185, inclusive.
Sec. 8. The Director of the Office may:
1. Accept any gift, donation, bequest or devise; and
2. Apply for and accept any grant, loan or other source of
money,
 to assist the Director in carrying out his or her duties.
Sec. 9. 1. The Account for the State Office of Health Care
Workforce and Licensing is hereby created in the State General
Fund. The Account must be administered by the Director of the
Office.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 223.631, any money
accepted pursuant to section 8 of this act must be deposited in the
Account.
3. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of
-
*SB425*

– 6 –
the fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
4. The money in the Account must only be used to carry out
the duties of the Office.
5. Claims against the Account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
Sec. 10. NRS 439A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 439A.012 to
439A.0195, inclusive, and section 2 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 11. NRS 439A.116 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.116 1. The Director of the Office shall establish and
maintain a database of information collected from applicants for the
renewal of a license, certificate or registration as a provider of
health care. The information in the database must include, for each
applicant from whom such information is collected:
(a) The type of license, certificate or registration held by the
applicant;
(b) The race and ethnicity of the applicant;
(c) The primary language spoken by the applicant;
(d) The specialty area in which the applicant practices;
(e) The county of this State in which the applicant spends the
majority of his or her working hours;
(f) The address of each location at which the applicant practices
or intends to practice and the percentage of working hours spent by
the applicant at each location;
(g) The type of practice in which the applicant engages,
including, without limitation, individual private practice, group
private practice, multispecialty group private practice, government
or nonprofit;
(h) The settings in which the applicant practices, including,
without limitation, hospitals, clinics and academic settings;
(i) The education and primary and secondary specialties of the
applicant;
(j) The average number of hours worked per week by the
applicant and the total number of weeks worked by the applicant
during the immediately preceding calendar year;
(k) The percentages of working hours during which the
applicant engages in patient care and other activities, including,
without limitation, teaching, research and administration;
(l) Any planned major changes to the practice of the applicant
within the immediately following 5 years, including, without
-
*SB425*

– 7 –
limitation, retirement, relocation or significant changes in working
hours; and
(m) Any other information prescribed by regulation of the
Director [.] of the Office.
2. The Director of the Office shall develop and make available
to each professional licensing board that licenses, certifies or
registers providers of health care an electronic data request that
solicits the information described in subsection 1 from an applicant
for the renewal of such a license, certificate or registration.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, information
included in the database is confidential and not a public record. The
Director of the Office shall:
(a) Take all necessary measures to ensure the confidentiality of
the identity of providers of health care to whom information in the
database pertains, including, without limitation, measures to ensure
that the identity of a provider of health care is not ascertainable due
to his or her reported profession or the reported location at which he
or she practices.
(b) Make data from the database that does not contain any
information that could be used to identify an applicant for or the
holder of a license, certificate or registration as a provider of health
care available to the Working Group. The Working Group may use
such data to support the recommendations made pursuant to NRS
439A.121 or include such data in any report published pursuant to
that section.
(c) Publish an annual report of data from the database that does
not contain any information that could be used to identify an
applicant for or holder of a license, certificate or registration as a
provider of health care.
(d) Analyze the data in the database and make periodic reports
to the Legislature, the Department and other agencies of the
Executive Branch of the State Government concerning ways in
which to:
(1) Attract more persons, including, without limitation,
members of underrepresented groups, to pursue the education
necessary to practice as a provider of health care and practice as a
provider of health care in this State; and
(2) Improve health outcomes and public health in this State.
Sec. 12. NRS 439A.118 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.118 1. The Director of the Office shall establish the
Health Care Workforce Working Group within the [Department.]
Office. The Director of the Office shall appoint to the Working
Group providers of health care and representatives of:
(a) Groups that represent providers of health care and consumers
of health care;
-
*SB425*

– 8 –
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education, universities, state
colleges, community colleges and other institutions in this State that
train providers of health care;
(c) The Department of Health and Human Services; and
(d) Professional licensing boards that license, certify or register
providers of health care.
2. The Director of the Office shall appoint a Chair of the
Working Group. The Working Group shall meet at the call of the
Chair. A majority of the members of the Working Group constitutes
a quorum and is required to transact any business of the Working
Group.
3. The members of the Working Group serve without
compensation and are not entitled to receive the per diem allowance
and travel expenses provided for state officers and employees
generally.
4. A member of the Working Group who is an officer or
employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must be
relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation
to prepare for and attend meetings of the Working Group and
perform any work necessary to carry out the duties of the Working
Group in the most timely manner practicable. A state agency or
political subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or
employee who is a member of the Working Group to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Working Group; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
5. The [Department] Office shall provide such administrative
support to the Working Group as is necessary to carry out the duties
of the Working Group.
Sec. 13. NRS 439A.121 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.121 1. The Working Group shall:
(a) Make recommendations to the Director of the Office
concerning the information included in the database pursuant to
NRS 439A.116;
(b) Analyze the information contained in the database; and
(c) Make recommendations to the Office, the Department of
Health and Human Services, the Department of Education, the
Board of Regents of the University of Nevada, the Legislature,
professional licensing boards that license, certify or register
providers of health care and other relevant persons and entities
concerning ways in which to:
(1) Attract more persons, including, without limitation,
members of underrepresented groups, to pursue the education
necessary to practice as a provider of health care and practice as a
provider of health care in this State; and
-
*SB425*

– 9 –
(2) Improve health outcomes and public health in this State.
2. The Working Group may publish reports of any of its
findings or recommendations.
Sec. 14. NRS 439A.122 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.122 1. The Director of the Office may:
(a) Adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the provisions
of NRS 439A.111 to 439A.122, inclusive;
(b) Enter into any contracts or agreements necessary to carry out
the provisions of NRS 439A.111 to 439A.122, inclusive; and
(c) Apply for and accept any gifts, grants and donations to carry
out the provisions of NRS 439A.111 to 439A.122, inclusive.
2. If the Director of the Office enters into a contract or
agreement pursuant to this section for the establishment or
maintenance of the database, the analysis of data or the issuance of
reports pursuant to NRS 439A.116, the contract must provide the
Director of the Office with unrestricted access to any data
maintained by the contracting entity and any analysis or reporting
performed by the contracting entity.
Sec. 15. NRS 439A.124 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.124 1. The [Department] Office shall develop and
make available to the Board of Medical Examiners and the State
Board of Osteopathic Medicine an electronic data request to be
completed by an applicant for the renewal of a license as a physician
or a biennial registration pursuant to NRS 630.267. The electronic
data request must solicit from each such applicant the following
information:
(a) Whether the applicant is employed by a hospital, a health
system or an entity owned by a health system or practices
independently from a hospital, a health system or an entity owned
by a health system;
(b) If the applicant is employed by a hospital, a health system or
an entity owned by a health system, the name of the hospital or
health system or the entity and the health system that owns the
entity, as applicable;
(c) If the applicant is employed by an entity other than a
hospital, a health system or an entity owned by a health system, the
name of the legal entity which owns the practice and any assumed
or fictitious name of that entity known to the applicant; and
(d) If the applicant practices independently from a hospital, a
health system or an entity owned by a health system, the name of
the practice of the applicant.
2. The [Department] Office shall collect and maintain the
information collected pursuant to subsection 1. Such information is
confidential and any reporting of the information maintained
-
*SB425*

– 10 –
pursuant to this section by the [Department] Office must be in an
aggregate form that does not reveal the identity of any physician.
3. The [Department] Office shall annually prepare and post on
an Internet website maintained by the [Department] Office a report
based on the data collected pursuant to subsection 1 that analyzes
trends in the employment and practices of physicians in this State.
Sec. 16. NRS 439A.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.130 As used in NRS 439A.130 to 439A.185, inclusive,
the words and terms defined in NRS [439A.135] 439A.140 to
439A.165, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 17. NRS 439A.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.170 1. The Physician Visa Waiver Program is hereby
established in the [Division.] Office. The [Administrator] Director
of the Office shall administer the Program consistent with federal
law and the provisions of NRS 439A.130 to 439A.185, inclusive,
and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The Program must:
(a) Provide for the oversight of employers and J-1 visa
physicians in this State;
(b) Evaluate applications for letters of support submitted
pursuant to NRS 439A.175; and
(c) Issue letters of support.
2. The [State Board of Health] Director of the Office shall
adopt regulations:
(a) Providing for the administration of the Program; and
(b) Establishing an application fee, not to exceed $2,000,
payable to the Program by an employer or J-1 visa physician who
applies for a letter of support pursuant to NRS 439A.175.
3. Any application fees collected by the Program are not
refundable and must be deposited in the State Treasury and
accounted for separately in the State General Fund. Any interest and
income earned on the money in the account, after deducting any
applicable charges, must be credited to the account. Any money
remaining in the account at the end of a fiscal year does not revert to
the State General Fund. All claims against the account must be paid
as other claims against the State are paid. The money in the account
must be used to pay the costs of administering the Program and for
training and educating J-1 visa physicians and employers.
4. The [Division] Office is hereby designated as the agency of
this State to cooperate with the Federal Government in the
administration of the Program.
Sec. 18. NRS 439A.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.175 1. An employer or J-1 visa physician who seeks a
letter of support must:
-
*SB425*

– 11 –
(a) Apply to the Program for a letter of support in the manner
prescribed by the [State Board of Health;] Office;
(b) Include with the application proof satisfactory to the
[Division] Office that the J-1 visa physician is licensed to practice
medicine pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS or has submitted an
application for a license to practice medicine pursuant to chapter
630 of NRS; and
(c) Include with the application a copy of the contract entered
into by the employer and the J-1 visa physician.
2. The contract entered into by the employer and the J-1 visa
physician:
(a) Must comply with:
(1) All applicable provisions of federal law; and
(2) The regulations adopted by the [State Board of Health]
Director of the Office pursuant to NRS 439A.130 to 439A.185,
inclusive.
(b) Must not include:
(1) A noncompete clause or restrictive covenant that prevents
or discourages the J-1 visa physician from continuing to practice
after the term of the contract expires; or
(2) Any provision authorizing termination without cause.
3. The Program may provide a letter of support to a J-1 visa
physician:
(a) If the Program determines that the waiver is in the public
interest;
(b) If the contract entered into by the employer and the J-1 visa
physician complies with the provisions of this section; and
(c) Upon payment of the prescribed application fee.
Sec. 19. NRS 439A.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439A.180 1. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by
law:
(a) A J-1 visa physician who:
(1) Does not provide the required minimum hours of health
services in an area designated by the Federal Government as a
health care professional shortage area;
(2) Refuses to provide health services to medically
underserved persons in this State; or
(3) Violates any provision of state law governing physicians
or the provision of health services; or
(b) An employer who:
(1) Employs a J-1 visa physician in a manner other than that
specified in the contract entered into by the employer and the J-1
visa physician;
(2) Violates any provision of NRS 439A.130 to 439A.185,
inclusive, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto; or
-
*SB425*

– 12 –
(3) Violates any provision of state law governing physicians
or the provision of health services,
 is subject to the penalty prescribed by the [State Board of Health]
Director of the Office pursuant to subsection 2.
2. The [State Board of Health] Director of the Office shall
adopt regulations establishing:
(a) The procedure for reporting a violation of this section; and
(b) The penalty for any violation of this section.
Sec. 20. NRS 450B.805 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.805 1. The health authority may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license as an attendant or a certificate as an
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license or certificate; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for a renewal of a
license or certificate pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.
Sec. 21. NRS 458A.057 is hereby amended to read as follows:
458A.057 1. “Qualified mental health professional” means
any of the following persons:
(a) A person who is certified as a problem gambling counselor
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641C of NRS.
(b) A person who is certified as a problem gambling counselor
intern pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641C of NRS.
(c) A physician who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS.
(d) A nurse who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
632 of NRS and is authorized by the State Board of Nursing to
engage in the practice of counseling problem gamblers.
(e) A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 641 of NRS or authorized to practice psychology in this
State pursuant to the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
enacted in NRS 641.227, or a psychological assistant who is
registered with the Board of [Psychological Examiners] Behavioral
-
*SB425*

– 13 –
Health Professionals pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641 of
NRS and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(f) A clinical professional counselor or clinical professional
counselor intern who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
(g) A marriage and family therapist or marriage and family
therapist intern who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
641A of NRS and is authorized by the Board of [Examiners for
Marriage and Family Therapists and Clinical Professional
Counselors] Behavioral Health Professionals to engage in the
practice of counseling persons with an addictive disorder related to
gambling.
(h) A person who is licensed as a clinical social worker pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 641B of NRS and is authorized by the
Board of [Examiners for Social Workers] Behavioral Health
Professionals to engage in the practice of counseling persons with
an addictive disorder related to gambling.
2. As used in this section, “practice of counseling persons with
an addictive disorder related to gambling” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 641C.105.
Sec. 22. NRS 49.213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
49.213 There is no privilege pursuant to NRS 49.209 or
49.211:
1. For communications relevant to an issue in a proceeding to
hospitalize the patient for mental illness, if the psychologist in the
course of diagnosis or treatment has determined that the patient
requires hospitalization.
2. For communications relevant to any determination made
pursuant to NRS 202.360.
3. For communications relevant to an issue of the treatment of
the patient in any proceeding in which the treatment is an element of
a claim or defense.
4. If disclosure is otherwise required by state or federal law.
5. For communications relevant to an issue in a proceeding to
determine the validity of a will of the patient.
6. If there is an immediate threat that the patient will harm
himself or herself or other persons.
7. For communications made in the course of a court-ordered
examination of the condition of a patient with respect to the specific
purpose of the examination unless the court orders otherwise.
8. For communications relevant to an issue in an investigation
or hearing conducted by the Board of [Psychological Examiners]
Behavioral Health Professionals pursuant to chapter 641 of NRS
if the treatment of the patient is an element of that investigation or
hearing.
-
*SB425*

– 14 –
9. For communications relevant to an issue in a proceeding
relating to the abuse or neglect of a person with a disability or a
person who is legally incompetent.
Sec. 23. NRS 86.555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.555 1. Except as otherwise provided by statute, an agency,
board or commission that regulates an occupation or profession
pursuant to title 54, 55 or 56 [or chapter 641D] of NRS may grant a
license to a limited-liability company or a foreign limited-liability
company if the agency, board or commission is authorized to grant a
license to a corporation formed pursuant to chapter 78 of NRS.
2. An agency, board or commission that makes a license
available to a limited-liability company or foreign limited-liability
company pursuant to subsection 1 shall adopt regulations:
(a) Listing the persons in the limited-liability company or
foreign limited-liability company who must qualify for the license
or indicating that the agency, board or commission will use other
means to determine whether the limited-liability company or foreign
limited-liability company qualifies for a license;
(b) Listing the persons who may engage in the activity for which
the license is required on behalf of the limited-liability company or
foreign limited-liability company;
(c) Indicating whether the limited-liability company or foreign
limited-liability company may engage in a business other than the
business for which the license is required;
(d) Listing the changes, if any, in the management or control of
the limited-liability company or foreign limited-liability company
that require notice, review, approval or other action by the agency,
board or commission; and
(e) Setting forth the conditions under which a limited-liability
company or foreign limited-liability company may obtain a license.
3. An agency, board or commission that adopts regulations
pursuant to subsection 2 shall not impose a restriction or
requirement on a limited-liability company or foreign limited-
liability company which is significantly different from or more
burdensome than the restrictions or requirements imposed on a
partnership or corporation.
Sec. 24. NRS 179A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179A.100 1. The following records of criminal history may
be disseminated by an agency of criminal justice without any
restriction pursuant to this chapter:
(a) Any which reflect records of conviction only; and
(b) Any which pertain to an incident for which a person is
currently within the system of criminal justice, including parole or
probation.
-
*SB425*

– 15 –
2. Without any restriction pursuant to this chapter, a record of
criminal history or the absence of such a record may be:
(a) Disclosed among agencies which maintain a system for the
mutual exchange of criminal records.
(b) Furnished by one agency to another to administer the system
of criminal justice, including the furnishing of information by a
police department to a district attorney.
(c) Reported to the Central Repository.
3. An agency of criminal justice shall disseminate to a
prospective employer, upon request, records of criminal history
concerning a prospective employee or volunteer which are the result
of a name-based inquiry and which:
(a) Reflect convictions only; or
(b) Pertain to an incident for which the prospective employee or
volunteer is currently within the system of criminal justice,
including parole or probation.
4. Records of criminal history must be disseminated by an
agency of criminal justice, upon request, to the following persons or
governmental entities:
(a) The person who is the subject of the record of criminal
history for the purposes of NRS 179A.150.
(b) The person who is the subject of the record of criminal
history when the subject is a party in a judicial, administrative,
licensing, disciplinary or other proceeding to which the information
is relevant.
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(d) The State Board of Nursing.
(e) The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board to investigate an
applicant for a license.
(f) A public administrator or a person employed or contracted
with pursuant to NRS 253.125, as applicable, to carry out the duties
as prescribed in chapter 253 of NRS.
(g) A public guardian to investigate a protected person or
proposed protected person or persons who may have knowledge of
assets belonging to a protected person or proposed protected person.
(h) Any agency of criminal justice of the United States or of
another state or the District of Columbia.
(i) Any public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Public
Utilities Commission of Nevada when the information is necessary
to conduct a security investigation of an employee or prospective
employee or to protect the public health, safety or welfare.
(j) Persons and agencies authorized by statute, ordinance,
executive order, court rule, court decision or court order as
construed by appropriate state or local officers or agencies.
-
*SB425*

– 16 –
(k) Any person or governmental entity which has entered into a
contract to provide services to an agency of criminal justice relating
to the administration of criminal justice, if authorized by the
contract, and if the contract also specifies that the information will
be used only for stated purposes and that it will be otherwise
confidential in accordance with state and federal law and regulation.
(l) Any reporter or editorial employee who is employed or
affiliated with a newspaper, press association or commercially
operated, federally licensed radio or television station who requests
a record of a named person or aggregate information for statistical
purposes, excluding any personal identifying information, in a
professional capacity for communication to the public.
(m) Prospective employers if the person who is the subject of
the information has given written consent to the release of that
information by the agency which maintains it.
(n) For the express purpose of research, evaluative or statistical
programs pursuant to an agreement with an agency of criminal
justice.
(o) An agency which provides child welfare services, as defined
in NRS 432B.030.
(p) The Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services or its designated
representative, as needed to ensure the safety of investigators and
caseworkers.
(q) The Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services or its designated
representative, as needed to ensure the safety of investigators and
caseworkers.
(r) An agency of this or any other state or the Federal
Government that is conducting activities pursuant to Part D of
Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the Social Security Act,
42 U.S.C. §§ 651 et seq.
(s) The Commissioner of Insurance.
(t) The Board of Medical Examiners.
(u) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine.
(v) The Board of Massage Therapy and its Executive Director.
(w) The Board of [Examiners for Social Workers.] Behavioral
Health Professionals.
(x) The State Board of Cosmetology and its Executive Director.
(y) The Committee on Domestic Violence appointed pursuant to
NRS 228.470 when, pursuant to NRS 228.495, the Committee is
reviewing the death of the victim of a crime that constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018.
(z) A county coroner or medical examiner, as needed to conduct
an investigation of the death of a person.
-
*SB425*

– 17 –
5. Agencies of criminal justice in this State which receive
information from sources outside this State concerning transactions
involving criminal justice which occur outside Nevada shall treat the
information as confidentially as is required by the provisions of this
chapter.
Sec. 25. NRS 218G.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218G.400 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each board created by the provisions of NRS 590.485 and chapters
623 to 625A, inclusive, 628, 630 to [644A,] 640E, inclusive, 642,
643, 644A, 648, 654 and 656 of NRS shall:
(a) If the revenue of the board from all sources is less than
$200,000 for any fiscal year and, if the board is a regulatory body
pursuant to NRS 622.060, the board has submitted to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for each quarter of that fiscal year
the information required by NRS 622.100, prepare a balance sheet
for that fiscal year on the form provided by the Legislative Auditor
and file the balance sheet with the Legislative Auditor and the Chief
of the Budget Division of the Office of Finance on or before
December 1 following the end of that fiscal year. The Legislative
Auditor shall prepare and make available a form that must be used
by a board to prepare such a balance sheet.
(b) If the revenue of the board from all sources is $200,000 or
more for any fiscal year, or if the board is a regulatory body
pursuant to NRS 622.060 and has failed to submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for each quarter of that fiscal year
the information required by NRS 622.100, engage the services of a
certified public accountant or public accountant, or firm of either of
such accountants, to audit all its fiscal records for that fiscal year
and file a report of the audit with the Legislative Auditor and the
Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of Finance on or before
December 1 following the end of that fiscal year.
2. In lieu of preparing a balance sheet or having an audit
conducted for a single fiscal year, a board may engage the services
of a certified public accountant or public accountant, or firm of
either of such accountants, to audit all its fiscal records for a period
covering two successive fiscal years. If such an audit is conducted,
the board shall file the report of the audit with the Legislative
Auditor and the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance on or before December 1 following the end of the second
fiscal year.
3. The cost of each audit conducted pursuant to subsection 1 or
2 must be paid by the board that is audited. Each such audit must be
conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards,
and all financial statements must be prepared in accordance with
-
*SB425*

– 18 –
generally accepted principles of accounting for special revenue
funds.
4. Whether or not a board is required to have its fiscal records
audited pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, the Legislative Auditor shall
audit the fiscal records of any such board whenever directed to do so
by the Legislative Commission. When the Legislative Commission
directs such an audit, the Legislative Commission shall also
determine who is to pay the cost of the audit.
5. A person who is a state officer or employee of a board is
guilty of nonfeasance if the person:
(a) Is responsible for preparing a balance sheet or having an
audit conducted pursuant to this section or is responsible for
preparing or maintaining the fiscal records that are necessary to
prepare a balance sheet or have an audit conducted pursuant to this
section; and
(b) Knowingly fails to prepare the balance sheet or have the
audit conducted pursuant to this section or knowingly fails to
prepare or maintain the fiscal records that are necessary to prepare a
balance sheet or have an audit conducted pursuant to this section.
6. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, a person who is
guilty of nonfeasance pursuant to this section forfeits the person’s
state office or employment and may not be appointed to a state
office or position of state employment for a period of 2 years
following the forfeiture. The provisions of this subsection do not
apply to a state officer who may be removed from office only by
impeachment pursuant to Article 7 of the Nevada Constitution.
Sec. 26. NRS 223.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.610 The Director of the Office of Science, Innovation and
Technology shall:
1. Advise the Governor and the Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development on matters relating to science,
innovation and technology.
2. Work in coordination with the Office of Economic
Development to establish criteria and goals for economic
development and diversification in this State in the areas of science,
innovation and technology.
3. As directed by the Governor, identify, recommend and carry
out policies related to science, innovation and technology.
4. Report periodically to the Executive Director of the Office
of Economic Development concerning the administration of the
policies and programs of the Office of Science, Innovation and
Technology.
5. Coordinate activities in this State relating to the planning,
mapping and procurement of broadband service in a competitively
-
*SB425*

– 19 –
neutral and nondiscriminatory manner, which must include, without
limitation:
(a) Development of a strategic plan to improve the delivery of
broadband services in this State to schools, libraries, providers of
health care, transportation facilities, prisons and other community
facilities;
(b) Applying for state and federal grants on behalf of eligible
entities and managing state matching money that has been
appropriated by the Legislature;
(c) Coordinating and processing applications for state and
federal money relating to broadband services;
(d) Prioritizing construction projects which affect or involve the
expansion or deployment of broadband services in this State;
(e) In consultation with providers of health care from various
health care settings, the expansion of telehealth services to reduce
health care costs and increase health care quality and access in this
State, especially in rural, unserved and underserved areas of this
State;
(f) Expansion of the fiber optic infrastructure in this State for the
benefit of the public safety radio and communications systems in
this State;
(g) Collection and storage of data relating to agreements and
contracts entered into by the State for the provision of fiber optic
assets in this State;
(h) Administration of the trade policy for fiber optic
infrastructure in this State; and
(i) Establishing and administering a program of infrastructure
grants for the development or improvement of broadband services
for persons with low income and persons in rural areas of this State
using money from the Account for the Grant Program for
Broadband Infrastructure created by NRS 223.660. The Director
may adopt regulations to carry out his or her duties pursuant to this
paragraph.
6. [Provide support to the Advisory Council on Graduate
Medical Education and implement the Graduate Medical Education
Grant Program established pursuant to NRS 223.637.
7.] In carrying out his or her duties pursuant to this section,
consult with the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development and cooperate with the Executive Director in
implementing the State Plan for Economic Development developed
by the Executive Director pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
[8.] 7. Administer such grants as are provided by legislative
appropriation.
-
*SB425*

– 20 –
Sec. 27. NRS 223.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.630 1. The Account for the Office of Science, Innovation
and Technology is hereby created in the State General Fund. The
Account must be administered by the Director of the Office of
Science, Innovation and Technology.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS [223.631 and]
223.660, any money accepted pursuant to NRS 223.620 must be
deposited in the Account.
3. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
4. The money in the Account must only be used to carry out
the duties of the Director.
5. Claims against the Account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
Sec. 28. NRS 223.631 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.631 1. The Account for the Graduate Medical Education
Grant Program is hereby created in the State General Fund. The
Director of the Office [of Science, Innovation and Technology] shall
administer the Account.
2. The Director of the Office [of Science, Innovation and
Technology] may:
(a) Accept any gift, donation, bequest or devise; and
(b) Apply for and accept any grant, loan or other source of
money,
 for deposit in the Account to assist the Director in carrying out
the Graduate Medical Education Grant Program established
pursuant to NRS 223.637.
3. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
4. The money in the Account must only be used to:
(a) Award competitive grants to institutions in this State seeking
to create, expand or retain programs for residency training and
postdoctoral fellowships that are approved by the Accreditation
Council for Graduate Medical Education or its successor
organization; and
(b) Defray the costs of establishing and administering the
Graduate Medical Education Grant Program established pursuant to
NRS 223.637.
5. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of the fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
6. Claims against the Account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
-
*SB425*

– 21 –
Sec. 29. NRS 223.633 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.633 1. The Advisory Council on Graduate Medical
Education is hereby created within the Office . [of Science,
Innovation and Technology.] The Council consists of:
(a) The dean of each medical school in this State that is
accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education of the
American Medical Association and the Association of American
Medical Colleges or their successor organizations, or his or her
designee;
(b) The dean of each school of osteopathic medicine in this State
that is accredited by the Commission on Osteopathic College
Accreditation of the American Osteopathic Association or its
successor organization, or his or her designee;
(c) Two members appointed by the [Governor] Director of the
Office who are physicians licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633
of NRS;
(d) One member appointed by the [Governor] Director of the
Office who represents hospitals located in counties whose
population is less than 100,000;
(e) One member appointed by the [Governor] Director of the
Office who represents hospitals located in counties whose
population is 100,000 or more but less than 700,000;
(f) One member appointed by the [Governor] Director of the
Office who represents hospitals located in a county whose
population is 700,000 or more;
(g) One member appointed by the [Governor] Director of the
Office who represents the medical corps of any of the Armed Forces
of the United States;
(h) One member appointed by the [Governor] Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services who represents the
Department of Health and Human Services; and
(i) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Office of Economic Development in the Office of the Governor.
2. In addition to the members appointed by the [Governor]
Director of the Office pursuant to subsection 1, the [Governor]
Director of the Office may appoint two members as the
[Governor] Director of the Office determines necessary to carry out
the provisions of NRS 223.631 to 223.639, inclusive.
3. After the initial terms, the term of each member of the
Council is 3 years, and members shall serve at the pleasure of the
[Governor.] appointing authority.
4. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Council
must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment not
later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs.
-
*SB425*

– 22 –
5. The Council shall select from its members a Chair and a
Vice Chair who shall hold office for 1 year and who may be
reselected.
6. The Council shall meet at the call of the Chair as often as
necessary to evaluate applications for competitive grants for the
Graduate Medical Education Grant Program established pursuant to
NRS 223.637 and make recommendations to the Office [of Science,
Innovation and Technology] concerning the approval of applications
for such grants.
7. A majority of the members of the Council constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at any meeting is sufficient for any official action
taken by the Council.
8. The members of the Council serve without compensation,
except that each member is entitled to receive the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally while engaged in the official business of the
Council.
9. A member of the Council who is an officer or employee of
this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation to
prepare for and attend meetings of the Council and perform any
work necessary to carry out the duties of the Council in the most
timely manner practicable. A state agency or political subdivision of
this State shall not require an officer or employee who is a member
of the Council to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Council; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
Sec. 30. NRS 223.635 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.635 The Advisory Council on Graduate Medical Education
shall:
1. Evaluate applications for competitive grants for the Graduate
Medical Education Grant Program established pursuant to NRS
223.637 and make recommendations to the Office [of Science,
Innovation and Technology] concerning the approval of applications
for such grants. In evaluating and making recommendations
concerning such applications, the Council shall give priority to the
award of grants for the retention of programs in this State for
residency training and postdoctoral fellows when the federal
funding for the support of such programs expires.
2. Study and make recommendations to the Office , [of
Science, Innovation and Technology,] the Governor , the Director
of the Department of Health and Human Services, the
Administrator and the Legislature concerning:
-
*SB425*

– 23 –
(a) The creation and retention of programs in this State for
residency training and postdoctoral fellows that are approved by the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or its
successor organization; and
(b) The recruitment and retention of physicians necessary to
meet the health care needs of the residents of this State, with the
emphasis on those health care needs.
Sec. 31. NRS 223.637 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.637 1. The Office [of Science, Innovation and
Technology] shall establish and administer a Graduate Medical
Education Grant Program as a competitive grant program to award
grants to institutions in this State seeking to create, expand or retain
programs for residency training and postdoctoral fellows that are
approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education or its successor organization.
2. In awarding grants pursuant to the Program established
pursuant to subsection 1, the Office [of Science, Innovation and
Technology] shall consider the recommendations of the Advisory
Council on Graduate Medical Education created by NRS 223.633
and give priority to the award of grants for the retention of programs
in this State for residency training and postdoctoral fellows when
the federal funding for the support of such programs expires.
3. The Office [of Science, Innovation and Technology] shall
establish a committee to develop a process, procedure and rubric for
evaluating applications for grants pursuant to the Program
established pursuant to subsection 1 to ensure that the process and
procedure are transparent, without bias, fair, equitable and
accessible. The committee established pursuant to this subsection
must be composed of persons with expertise in subject matters
related to graduate medical education who are not affiliated with
any applicant for a grant pursuant to the Program established
pursuant to subsection 1.
4. The Office [of Science, Innovation and Technology] may
adopt regulations necessary to carry out the Program established
pursuant to subsection 1. Such regulations may include, without
limitation, the requirements to apply for and receive a grant.
Sec. 32. NRS 223.639 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.639 1. On or before October 1 of each year, the Office
[of Science, Innovation and Technology] shall submit a written
report to:
(a) The Governor [;] , the Director of the Department of Health
and Human Services and the Administrator; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
-
*SB425*

– 24 –
(1) The Interim Finance Committee in an odd-numbered
year; or
(2) The next regular session of the Legislature in an even-
numbered year.
2. The report must include, without limitation:
(a) Information on the Graduate Medical Education Grant
Program established pursuant to NRS 223.637; and
(b) Any recommendations regarding graduate medical education
in this State, including, without limitation:
(1) The creation, expansion and retention of programs in this
State for residency training and postdoctoral fellows; and
(2) Methods by which this State may recruit and retain
physicians necessary to meet the health care needs of the residents
of this State.
Sec. 33. NRS 226.464 is hereby amended to read as follows:
226.464 The State Treasurer:
1. May employ such staff as the State Treasurer deems
necessary to administer the Program.
2. May consult with and request the assistance of the Director
of the State Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the
Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services for any purpose relating to the
Program.
3. Shall post information about the Program, including, without
limitation, the requirements to be eligible to receive repayment of
student education loans from the Program and the procedure to
apply for such repayment, on an Internet website maintained by the
State Treasurer.
Sec. 34. NRS 232.361 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.361 1. There is hereby created in the Department a
Commission on Behavioral Health consisting of 10 members
appointed by the Governor, at least 3 of whom have training or
experience in dealing with intellectual disabilities.
2. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) A psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this State,
from a list of three candidates submitted by the Nevada Psychiatric
Association;
(b) A psychologist licensed to practice in this State and
experienced in clinical practice, from a list of four candidates
submitted by the Nevada Psychological Association, two of whom
must be from northern Nevada and two of whom must be from
southern Nevada;
(c) A physician, other than a psychiatrist, licensed to practice
medicine in this State and who has experience in dealing with
-
*SB425*

– 25 –
intellectual disabilities, from a list of three candidates submitted by
the Nevada State Medical Association;
(d) A clinical social worker licensed to practice in this State who
has experience in dealing with mental illness or intellectual
disabilities, or both;
(e) A registered nurse licensed to practice in this State who has
experience in dealing with mental illness or intellectual disabilities,
or both, from a list of three candidates submitted by the Nevada
Nurses Association;
(f) A marriage and family therapist or clinical professional
counselor licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS;
(g) A person who is licensed or certified pursuant to chapter
641C of NRS who is not an intern;
(h) A current or former recipient of mental health services
provided by the State or any agency thereof;
(i) A representative of the general public who has a special
interest in the field of mental health; and
(j) A representative of the general public who has a special
interest in the field of intellectual disabilities.
3. The Governor shall appoint the Chair of the Commission
from among its members.
4. After the initial terms, each member shall serve a term of 4
years. If a vacancy occurs during a member’s term, the Governor
shall appoint a person qualified under this section to replace that
member for the remainder of the unexpired term.
5. A person may not serve concurrently as a member of the
Commission and a member of the Board of [Psychological
Examiners, the Board of Examiners for Marriage and Family
Therapists and Clinical Professional Counselors, the Board of
Examiners for Social Workers or the Board of Examiners for
Alcohol, Drug and Gambling Counselors.] Behavioral Health
Professionals or any Advisory Committee created by or pursuant
to the chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 35. NRS 232.8415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.8415 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards shall be responsible for:
(a) Centralized administration;
(b) A uniform set of standards for investigations, licensing
and discipline, including, without limitation, separating the roles and
responsibilities for occupational licensure from the roles and
responsibilities for occupational discipline;
(c) A uniform set of standards for internal controls;
(d) A uniform set of standards for legal representation;
(e) A consistent set of structural standards for boards and
commissions;
-
*SB425*

– 26 –
(f) Transparency and consumer protection; and
(g) Efficacy and efficiency.
2. To the extent permitted by the Nevada Constitution and
federal law, all professional and occupational licensing boards
created by the Legislature shall be under the purview of the Office,
including, without limitation:
(a) The Nevada State Board of Accountancy created by
NRS 628.035.
(b) The Board of [Examiners for Alcohol, Drug and Gambling
Counselors] Behavioral Health Professionals created by [NRS
641C.150.] section 63 of this act.
(c) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design created by NRS 623.050.
(d) The Board of Athletic Trainers created by NRS 640B.170.
(e) The State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation Board created by
NRS 643.020.
(f) [The Board of Applied Behavior Analysis created by
NRS 641D.200.
(g)] The Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 634.020.
[(h)] (g) The State Contractors’ Board created by NRS 624.040.
[(i)] (h) The Commission on Construction Education created by
NRS 624.570.
[(j)] (i) The State Board of Cosmetology created by
NRS 644A.200.
[(k)] (j) The Certified Court Reporters’ Board of Nevada
created by NRS 656.040.
[(l)] (k) The Board of Dental Examiners of Nevada created by
NRS 631.120.
[(m)] (l) The Committee on Dental Hygiene and Dental
Therapy created by NRS 631.205.
[(n)] (m) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors created by NRS 625.100.
[(o)] (n) The Nevada Funeral and Cemetery Services Board
created by NRS 642.020.
[(p)] (o) The Nevada Board of Homeopathic Medical
Examiners created pursuant to NRS 630A.100.
[(q)] (p) The State Board of Landscape Architecture created by
NRS 623A.080.
[(r) The Board of Examiners for Marriage and Family Therapists
and Clinical Professional Counselors created by NRS 641A.090.
(s)] (q) The Board of Massage Therapy created by
NRS 640C.150.
[(t)] (r) The Board of Medical Examiners created pursuant to
NRS 630.050.
-
*SB425*

– 27 –
[(u)] (s) The State Board of Nursing created by NRS 632.020.
[(v)] (t) The Advisory Committee on Nursing Assistants and
Medication Aides created by NRS 632.072.
[(w)] (u) The Board of Occupational Therapy created by
NRS 640A.080.
[(x)] (v) The Board of Dispensing Opticians created by
NRS 637.030.
[(y)] (w) The Nevada State Board of Optometry created by
NRS 636.030.
[(z)] (x) The State Board of Oriental Medicine created by
NRS 634A.030.
[(aa)] (y) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine created
pursuant to NRS 633.181.
[(bb)] (z) The Commission on Postsecondary Education created
by NRS 394.383.
[(cc)] (aa) The State Board of Pharmacy created by
NRS 639.020.
[(dd)] (bb) The Nevada Physical Therapy Board created by
NRS 640.030.
[(ee)] (cc) The State Board of Podiatry created by
NRS 635.020.
[(ff)] (dd) The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board created
by NRS 648.020.
[(gg) The Board of Psychological Examiners created by
NRS 641.030.
(hh)] (ee) The Board of Environmental Health Specialists
created by NRS 625A.030.
[(ii) The Board of Examiners for Social Workers created
pursuant to NRS 641B.100.
(jj)] (ff) The Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology and
Hearing Aid Dispensing Board created by NRS 637B.100.
[(kk)] (gg) The Nevada State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners created by NRS 638.020.
Sec. 36. NRS 232A.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232A.015 1. If the Governor must appoint to a board a
person who is a member of a profession being regulated by that
board, the Governor shall solicit nominees from one or more
applicable professional associations in this State.
2. To the extent practicable, such an applicable professional
association shall provide nominees who represent the geographic
diversity of this State.
3. The Governor may appoint any qualified person to a board,
without regard to whether the person is nominated pursuant to this
section.
-
*SB425*

– 28 –
4. As used in this section, “board” refers to a board created
pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632, 633, 634, 634A, 635, 636,
637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B [,] or 640C [, 641, 641A, 641B,
641C or 641D] of NRS.
Sec. 37. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
-
*SB425*

– 29 –
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, [641.090,]
641.221, 641.2215, [641A.191,] 641A.217, 641A.262, [641B.170,]
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, [641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,]
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
-
*SB425*

– 30 –
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 67 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
-
*SB425*

– 31 –
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 38. NRS 284.013 is hereby amended to read as follows:
284.013 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, this
chapter does not apply to:
(a) Agencies, bureaus, commissions, officers or personnel in the
Legislative Department or the Judicial Department of State
Government, including the Commission on Judicial Discipline;
(b) Any person who is employed by a board, commission,
committee or council created in chapters 445C, 590, 623 to 625A,
inclusive, 628, 630 to [644A,] 640E, inclusive, 642, 643, 644A, 648,
652, 654 and 656 of NRS; or
(c) Officers or employees of any agency of the Executive
Department of the State Government who are exempted by specific
statute.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the terms and
conditions of employment of all persons referred to in subsection 1,
including salaries not prescribed by law and leaves of absence,
including, without limitation, annual leave and sick and disability
leave, must be fixed by the appointing or employing authority
within the limits of legislative appropriations or authorizations.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, leaves of
absence prescribed pursuant to subsection 2 must not be of lesser
duration than those provided for other state officers and employees
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The provisions of this
subsection do not govern the Legislative Commission with respect
to the personnel of the Legislative Counsel Bureau.
4. Any board, commission, committee or council created in
chapters 445C, 590, 623 to 625A, inclusive, 628, 630 to [644A,]
640E, inclusive, 642, 643, 644A, 648, 652, 654 and 656 of NRS
which contracts for the services of a person, shall require the
contract for those services to be in writing. The contract must be
approved by the State Board of Examiners before those services
may be provided.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 284.4086, to the
extent that they are inconsistent or otherwise in conflict, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply to any terms and conditions
-
*SB425*

– 32 –
of employment that are properly within the scope of and subject to
the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement or a
supplemental bargaining agreement that is enforceable pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 288.400 to 288.630, inclusive.
Sec. 39. NRS 353.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.005 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 353.007, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply to boards created by the
provisions of NRS 590.485 and chapters 623 to 625A, inclusive,
628, 630 to [644A,] 640E, inclusive, 642, 643, 644A, 648, 654 and
656 of NRS and the officers and employees of those boards.
Sec. 40. NRS 353A.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353A.020 1. The Director, in consultation with the
Committee and Legislative Auditor, shall adopt a uniform system of
internal accounting and administrative control for agencies. The
elements of the system must include, without limitation:
(a) A plan of organization which provides for a segregation of
duties appropriate to safeguard the assets of the agency;
(b) A plan which limits access to assets of the agency to persons
who need the assets to perform their assigned duties;
(c) Procedures for authorizations and recordkeeping which
effectively control accounting of assets, liabilities, revenues and
expenses;
(d) A system of practices to be followed in the performance of
the duties and functions of each agency; and
(e) An effective system of internal review.
2. The Director, in consultation with the Committee and
Legislative Auditor, may modify the system whenever the Director
considers it necessary.
3. Each agency shall develop written procedures to carry out
the system of internal accounting and administrative control adopted
pursuant to this section.
4. For the purposes of this section, “agency” does not include:
(a) A board created by the provisions of NRS 590.485 and
chapters 623 to 625A, inclusive, 628, 630 to [644A,] 640E,
inclusive, 642, 643, 644A, 648, 654 and 656 of NRS.
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(c) The Public Employees’ Retirement System.
(d) The Housing Division of the Department of Business and
Industry.
(e) The Colorado River Commission of Nevada.
Sec. 41. NRS 353A.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353A.025 1. The head of each agency shall periodically
review the agency’s system of internal accounting and
administrative control to determine whether it is in compliance with
-
*SB425*

– 33 –
the uniform system of internal accounting and administrative control
for agencies adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 353A.020.
2. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the head of
each agency shall report to the Director whether the agency’s
system of internal accounting and administrative control is in
compliance with the uniform system adopted pursuant to subsection
1 of NRS 353A.020. The reports must be made available for
inspection by the members of the Legislature.
3. For the purposes of this section, “agency” does not include:
(a) A board created by the provisions of NRS 590.485 and
chapters 623 to 625A, inclusive, 628, 630 to [644A,] 640E,
inclusive, 642, 643, 644A, 648, 654 and 656 of NRS.
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(c) The Public Employees’ Retirement System.
(d) The Housing Division of the Department of Business and
Industry.
(e) The Colorado River Commission of Nevada.
4. The Director shall, on or before the first Monday in
February of each odd-numbered year, submit a report on the status
of internal accounting and administrative controls in agencies to the:
(a) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the:
(1) Senate Standing Committee on Finance; and
(2) Assembly Standing Committee on Ways and Means;
(b) Governor; and
(c) Legislative Auditor.
5. The report submitted by the Director pursuant to subsection
4 must include, without limitation:
(a) The identification of each agency that has not complied with
the requirements of subsections 1 and 2;
(b) The identification of each agency that does not have an
effective method for reviewing its system of internal accounting and
administrative control; and
(c) The identification of each agency that has weaknesses in its
system of internal accounting and administrative control, and the
extent and types of such weaknesses.
Sec. 42. NRS 353A.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353A.045 The Administrator shall:
1. Report to the Director.
2. Develop long-term and annual work plans to be based on the
results of periodic documented risk assessments. The annual work
plan must list the agencies to which the Division will provide
training and assistance and be submitted to the Director for
approval. Such agencies must not include:
-
*SB425*

– 34 –
(a) A board created by the provisions of NRS 590.485 and
chapters 623 to 625A, inclusive, 628, 630 to [644A,] 640E,
inclusive, 642, 643, 644A, 648, 654 and 656 of NRS.
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(c) The Public Employees’ Retirement System.
(d) The Housing Division of the Department of Business and
Industry.
(e) The Colorado River Commission of Nevada.
3. Provide a copy of the approved annual work plan to the
Legislative Auditor.
4. In consultation with the Director, prepare a plan for auditing
executive branch agencies for each fiscal year and present the plan
to the Committee for its review and approval. Each plan for auditing
must:
(a) State the agencies which will be audited, the proposed scope
and assignment of those audits and the related resources which will
be used for those audits; and
(b) Ensure that the internal accounting, administrative controls
and financial management of each agency are reviewed periodically.
5. Perform the audits of the programs and activities of the
agencies in accordance with the plan approved pursuant to
subsection 5 of NRS 353A.038 and prepare audit reports of his or
her findings.
6. Review each agency that is audited pursuant to subsection 5
and advise those agencies concerning internal accounting,
administrative controls and financial management.
7. Submit to each agency that is audited pursuant to subsection
5 analyses, appraisals and recommendations concerning:
(a) The adequacy of the internal accounting and administrative
controls of the agency; and
(b) The efficiency and effectiveness of the management of the
agency.
8. Report any possible abuses, illegal actions, errors, omissions
and conflicts of interest of which the Division becomes aware
during the performance of an audit.
9. Adopt the standards of The Institute of Internal Auditors for
conducting and reporting on internal audits.
10. Consult with the Legislative Auditor concerning the plan
for auditing and the scope of audits to avoid duplication of effort
and undue disruption of the functions of agencies that are audited
pursuant to subsection 5.
Sec. 43. NRS 391.0349 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.0349 1. Each school counselor and school psychologist
shall complete continuing education as determined by the
Commission.
-
*SB425*

– 35 –
2. The Commission shall adopt regulations establishing
continuing education requirements for school counselors and school
psychologists. The regulations must include, without limitation, the
amount of continuing education a school counselor or school
psychologist must complete pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Each school social worker shall complete continuing
education as determined by the Board of [Examiners for Social
Workers.] Behavioral Health Professionals.
4. The Board of [Examiners for Social Workers] Behavioral
Health Professionals shall adopt regulations establishing continuing
education requirements for school social workers. The regulations
must include, without limitation, the amount of continuing
education a school social worker must complete pursuant to
subsection 3.
Sec. 44. NRS 396.898 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.898 The Board of Regents may:
1. Receive, invest, disburse and account for all money received
for the program.
2. Report to the Governor and the Legislature before
September 1 of any year preceding a regular session of the
Legislature, setting forth in detail the transactions conducted by it
during the biennium ending June 30 of such year.
3. Make recommendations for any legislative action deemed by
it advisable.
4. Consult with and request the assistance of the Director of
the State Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the
Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services for any purpose relating to the
establishment or implementation of any program pursuant to NRS
396.890 to 396.898, inclusive.
Sec. 45. NRS 396.902 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.902 The University of Nevada School of Medicine may:
1. Apply for any matching money available for the program
from the Federal Government.
2. Adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of
NRS 396.899 to 396.903, inclusive.
3. Receive, invest, disburse and account for all money received
from the Federal Government or any other source for this program.
4. Consult with and request the assistance of the Director of
the State Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the
Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services for any purpose relating to the
Nevada Health Service Corps.
-
*SB425*

– 36 –
Sec. 46. NRS 396.905 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.905 1. Any gift, donation, bequest, grant or other source
of money received by the University of Nevada School of Medicine
for the development of an obstetrical access program may be used
to:
[1.] (a) Provide financial support and education to faculty and
residents in the Departments of Family and Community Medicine
and Obstetrics and Gynecology within the University of Nevada
School of Medicine and to expand the clinical services provided by
such faculty and residents in areas and to populations that need
obstetrical services.
[2.] (b) Provide money to Nevada Health Centers, Inc., or its
successor, to expand the clinical prenatal and obstetrical practice
base of community health center clinics and to provide uninsured,
underinsured and Medicaid patients with increased access to clinical
prenatal and obstetrical care.
[3.] (c) Establish a fund that allows practicing community
providers of prenatal care that are participating in the obstetrical
access program to draw upon money to partially compensate them
for providing care to patients who have no access to clinical care
because of their financial status.
[4.] (d) Develop a database of clinical practitioners providing
prenatal or obstetrical services throughout the State to monitor and
analyze:
[(a)] (1) The relationship between declining services and the
supply and distribution of appropriate providers of health care;
[(b)] (2) The impact of access to care issues on pregnant
women, including, without limitation, poor birth outcomes which
result from lack of access to care, the financial impact of such poor
birth outcomes and the effects of receiving inadequate prenatal care;
and
[(c)] (3) The impact of adverse judicial decisions on the
delivery of obstetrical services.
[5.] (e) Subsidize malpractice costs for clinical providers of
prenatal care who maintain at least 30 percent or more of prenatal or
obstetrical patients in their practice who are uninsured, underinsured
or insured by Medicaid, or who use a sliding fee scale based on a
patient’s financial resources when charging for such services. The
subsidy must be calculated based on the number of qualified clinical
providers of prenatal care, the proportion of financially
compromised patients served by such providers and the total amount
of money available for subsidies.
2. The University of Nevada School of Medicine may consult
with and request the assistance of the Director of the State Office
of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of Public
-
*SB425*

– 37 –
and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services for any purpose relating to the implementation of the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 47. NRS 396.906 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.906 1. The Nevada Office of Rural Health is hereby
established within the University of Nevada School of Medicine to
administer matters relating to the delivery of health care services to
rural and frontier areas in this state. The Nevada Office of Rural
Health shall:
(a) Evaluate the need for programs concerning the delivery of
health care services to rural and frontier areas in this state and make
recommendations to the University of Nevada School of Medicine
and the Legislature to carry out such programs; and
(b) Establish, administer and coordinate programs which affect
the delivery of health care services to rural and frontier areas in this
state, including, without limitation, programs relating to:
(1) The education and training of providers of health care
who provide services in rural and frontier areas;
(2) The needs of rural and frontier areas for health care
services and the manner in which such health care services may be
effectively delivered;
(3) The delivery of health care services to rural and frontier
areas;
(4) The financing of the delivery of health care services to
rural and frontier areas; or
(5) The collection of data necessary for the Nevada Office of
Rural Health to carry out its duties concerning the delivery of health
care services to rural and frontier areas.
2. Any gift, donation, bequest, grant or other source of money
received by the Nevada Office of Rural Health may be used to carry
out the provisions of this section.
3. The Nevada Office of Rural Health or the University of
Nevada School of Medicine may consult with and request the
assistance of the Director of the State Office of Health Care
Workforce and Licensing of the Division of Public and Behavioral
Health of the Department of Health and Human Services for any
purpose relating to the duties prescribed by this section.
Sec. 48. NRS 396.907 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.907 1. The Area Health Education Center Program is
hereby established within the University of Nevada School of
Medicine to support education and training programs for students
studying to become practitioners, or residents or practitioners who
will provide or are providing health care services in medically
underserved areas in this state, including urban and rural areas. The
Area Health Education Center Program shall:
-
*SB425*

– 38 –
(a) Assist the area health education centers within Nevada in
providing:
(1) Career opportunities in health care;
(2) Information to practitioners and other providers of health
care;
(3) Continuing education for practitioners and other
providers of health care; and
(4) Stipends for the education and training of students
studying to become practitioners and residents who will provide or
who are providing health care services in medically underserved
areas in this state;
(b) Assess and develop training programs concerning the
appropriate curriculum for primary care and other priority health
care services;
(c) Enhance the training programs in primary care by providing
additional entry-level positions and faculty to increase the
availability of practitioners and other providers of health care;
(d) Increase the percentage of medical students committing to
residencies and careers in primary care;
(e) Provide a greater percentage of primary care residents to
medically underserved areas in this state;
(f) Develop and enhance training programs necessary to address
the primary health care needs of persons in this state; and
(g) Establish interdisciplinary opportunities for education and
training for practitioners and other providers of health care.
2. Any gift, donation, bequest, grant or other source of money
received by the Area Health Education Center Program may be used
to carry out the provisions of this section.
3. The Area Health Education Center Program or the
University of Nevada School of Medicine may consult with and
request the assistance of the Director of the State Office of Health
Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services for any purpose relating to the duties prescribed by this
section.
4. As used in this section, “practitioner” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439A.0195.
Sec. 49. NRS 396.908 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.908 1. The Medical Education Council of Nevada is
hereby established within the University of Nevada School of
Medicine to ensure that Nevada has an adequate, well-trained health
care workforce to meet the needs of the residents of this State. The
Medical Education Council of Nevada shall:
(a) Determine the workforce needs for the provision of health
care services in this State;
-
*SB425*

– 39 –
(b) Determine the number and types of positions of employment
for which money appropriated to the Medical Education Council of
Nevada may be used, including, without limitation, positions for
practitioners, other providers of health care and other personnel to
staff health care facilities and programs;
(c) Investigate and make recommendations to the University of
Nevada School of Medicine and the Legislature on the status and
needs of practitioners, other providers of health care and other
personnel of health care facilities or programs;
(d) Determine a method for reimbursing institutions that sponsor
practitioners, other providers of health care or other personnel of
health care facilities or programs;
(e) To the extent authorized by federal law, prepare and submit a
formal application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services for the purpose of receiving and dispersing federal money
for graduate medical education expenses;
(f) Distribute a portion of any money it receives for graduate
medical education expenses in a manner that:
(1) Prepares postgraduate medical and dental residents, as
defined by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education, to provide inpatient, outpatient and hospital services in
various communities and in geographically diverse settings;
(2) Encourages the coordination of interdisciplinary clinical
training by practitioners and other providers of health care to such
postgraduate medical and dental residents; and
(3) Promotes funding for accredited clinical training
programs provided by practitioners or other providers of health care
to such postgraduate medical and dental residents;
(g) Apply for grants, gifts and donations from public and private
sources, including the Federal Government, to carry out the
objectives of the Medical Education Council of Nevada;
(h) Initiate a cooperative agreement with the Department of
Health and Human Services to promote the intergovernmental
transfer of money for the purposes of receiving and dispersing
money to carry out the objectives of the Medical Education Council
of Nevada; and
(i) Distribute additional financial resources to training programs
for practitioners, other providers of health care or other personnel of
health care facilities or programs in the State.
2. Any gift, donation, bequest, grant or other source of money
received by the Medical Education Council of Nevada may be used
to carry out the provisions of this section.
3. The Medical Education Council of Nevada or the
University of Nevada School of Medicine may consult with and
-
*SB425*

– 40 –
request the assistance of the Director of the State Office of Health
Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services for any purpose relating to the duties prescribed by this
section.
4. As used in this section, “practitioner” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439A.0195.
Sec. 50. NRS 433A.162 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433A.162 1. A public or private mental health facility or
hospital may admit a person who has been placed on a mental health
crisis hold under an emergency admission if:
(a) After conducting an examination pursuant to NRS 433A.165,
a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered
nurse determines that the person does not have a medical condition,
other than a psychiatric condition, which requires immediate
treatment;
(b) A psychologist, a physician, a physician assistant under the
supervision of a psychiatrist, a clinical social worker who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the Board of
[Examiners for Social Workers] Behavioral Health Professionals
pursuant to NRS 641B.160 or an advanced practice registered nurse
who has the psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the
State Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120, who is employed
by the public or private mental health facility or hospital completes
a certificate pursuant to NRS 433A.170;
(c) A psychiatrist or a psychologist or, if a psychiatrist or a
psychologist is not available, a physician or an advanced practice
registered nurse who has the training and experience prescribed by
the State Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120, evaluates the
person at the time of admission and determines that the person is a
person in a mental health crisis; and
(d) A psychiatrist approves the admission.
2. The provisions of subsections 2 and 3 of NRS 433A.150
continue to apply to a person who is admitted to a public or private
mental health facility or hospital under an emergency admission
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 51. NRS 433A.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433A.170 Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
administrative officer of a facility operated by the Division or of any
other public or private mental health facility or hospital shall not
accept a person for an emergency admission under NRS 433A.162
unless a psychologist, a physician, a physician assistant under the
supervision of a psychiatrist, a clinical social worker who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the Board of
[Examiners for Social Workers] Behavioral Health Professionals
-
*SB425*

– 41 –
pursuant to NRS 641B.160 or an advanced practice registered nurse
who has the psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the
State Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120 completes a
certificate stating that he or she has examined the person alleged to
be a person in a mental health crisis and that he or she has
concluded that the person is a person in a mental health crisis. The
certificate required by this section may be obtained from a
psychologist, physician, physician assistant, clinical social worker
or advanced practice registered nurse who is employed by the public
or private mental health facility or hospital to which the person
alleged to be a person in a mental health crisis is to be admitted.
Sec. 52. NRS 433A.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433A.195 1. A licensed physician on the medical staff of a
facility operated by the Division or of any other public or private
mental health facility or hospital may release a person from a mental
health crisis hold upon completion of a certificate which meets the
requirements of NRS 433A.197 signed by a licensed physician on
the medical staff of the facility or hospital, a physician assistant
under the supervision of a psychiatrist, psychologist, a clinical social
worker who has the psychiatric training and experience prescribed
by the Board of [Examiners for Social Workers] Behavioral Health
Professionals pursuant to NRS 641B.160 or an advanced practice
registered nurse who has the psychiatric training and experience
prescribed by the State Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120
stating that he or she has personally observed and examined the
person and that he or she has concluded that the person is not a
person in a mental health crisis.
2. A psychologist, a physician, a physician assistant under the
supervision of a psychiatrist, a clinical social worker who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the Board of
[Examiners for Social Workers] Behavioral Health Professionals
pursuant to NRS 641B.160 or an advanced practice registered nurse
who has the psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the
State Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120 on the medical
staff of a facility operated by the Division or of any other public or
private mental health facility or hospital who has personally
assessed an unemancipated person who is less than 18 years of age
after the person was placed on a mental health crisis hold may
release the person from the hold if the parent or guardian of the
person agrees to treatment or accepts physical custody of the person.
Sec. 53. NRS 433A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433A.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
432B.6075 and 432B.60814, a proceeding for an involuntary court-
ordered admission of any person in the State of Nevada may be
commenced by the filing of a petition for the involuntary admission
-
*SB425*

– 42 –
to a mental health facility with the clerk of the district court of the
county where the person who is to be treated resides or the county
where a mental health facility that is willing to admit the person is
located. The petition may be filed by any physician, physician
assistant, psychologist, social worker or registered nurse or by any
officer authorized to make arrests in the State of Nevada. The
petition must be accompanied:
(a) By a certificate of a physician, a psychologist, a physician
assistant under the supervision of a psychiatrist, a clinical social
worker who has the psychiatric training and experience prescribed
by the Board of [Examiners for Social Workers] Behavioral Health
Professionals pursuant to NRS 641B.160 or an advanced practice
registered nurse who has the psychiatric training and experience
prescribed by the State Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120
stating that he or she has examined the person alleged to be a person
in a mental health crisis and has concluded that the person is a
person in a mental health crisis; or
(b) By a sworn written statement by the petitioner that:
(1) The petitioner has, based upon the petitioner’s personal
observation of the person alleged to be a person in a mental health
crisis, probable cause to believe that the person is a person in a
mental health crisis and the person alleged to be a person in a mental
health crisis has refused to submit to examination or treatment by a
physician, psychiatrist, psychologist or advanced practice registered
nurse who has the psychiatric training and experience prescribed by
the State Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(2) The person alleged to be a person in a mental health crisis
has been placed on a mental health crisis hold pursuant to NRS
433A.160 and the physician, physician assistant or advanced
practice registered nurse who examined the person alleged to be a
person with a mental health crisis pursuant to NRS 433A.165
determined that the person has a medical condition, other than a
psychiatric condition, which requires immediate treatment.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 432B.6075 and
432B.60814, if the person to be treated is an unemancipated minor
and the petitioner is a person other than a parent or guardian of the
minor, a petition submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must, in
addition to the certificate or statement required by that subsection,
include a statement signed by a parent or guardian of the minor that
the parent or guardian does not object to the filing of the petition.
Sec. 54. NRS 433A.335 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433A.335 1. A proceeding for an order requiring any person
in the State of Nevada to receive assisted outpatient treatment may
be commenced by the filing of a petition for such an order with the
-
*SB425*

– 43 –
clerk of the district court of the county where the person who is to
be treated is present. The petition may be filed by:
(a) Any person who is at least 18 years of age and resides with
the person to be treated;
(b) The spouse, parent, adult sibling, adult child or legal
guardian of the person to be treated;
(c) A physician, physician assistant, psychologist, social worker
or registered nurse who is providing care to the person to be treated;
(d) The Administrator or his or her designee; or
(e) The medical director of a division facility in which the
person is receiving treatment or the designee of the medical director
of such a division facility.
2. A proceeding to require a person who is the defendant in a
criminal proceeding in the district court to receive assisted
outpatient treatment may be commenced:
(a) By the district court:
(1) On its own motion;
(2) By motion of the defendant or the district attorney; or
(3) After a justice court or a municipal court, upon approval
of the district court, transfers original jurisdiction to the district
court of a case involving a defendant who is eligible to receive
assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to this section; and
(b) If:
(1) The defendant has been examined in accordance with
NRS 178.415;
(2) The defendant is not eligible for commitment to the
custody of the Administrator pursuant to NRS 178.461; and
(3) The Division makes a clinical determination that assisted
outpatient treatment is appropriate for the defendant.
3. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 or a motion made
pursuant to subsection 2 must allege the following concerning the
person to be treated:
(a) The person is at least 18 years of age.
(b) The person has a mental illness.
(c) The person has a history of poor compliance with treatment
for his or her mental illness that has resulted in at least one of the
following circumstances:
(1) At least twice during the immediately preceding 48
months, poor compliance with mental health treatment has been a
significant factor in causing the person to be hospitalized or receive
services in the behavioral health unit of a detention facility or
correctional facility. The 48-month period described in this
subparagraph must be extended by any amount of time that the
person has been hospitalized, incarcerated or detained during that
period.
-
*SB425*

– 44 –
(2) Poor compliance with mental health treatment has been a
significant factor in causing the person to commit, attempt to
commit or threaten to commit serious physical harm to himself or
herself or others during the immediately preceding 48 months. The
48-month period described in this subparagraph must be extended
by any amount of time that the person has been hospitalized,
incarcerated or detained during that period.
(3) Poor compliance with mental health treatment has
resulted in the person being hospitalized, incarcerated or detained
for a cumulative period of at least 6 months and the person:
(I) Is scheduled to be discharged or released from such
hospitalization, incarceration or detention during the 30 days
immediately following the date of the petition; or
(II) Has been discharged or released from such
hospitalization, incarceration or detention during the 60 days
immediately preceding the date of the petition.
(d) Because of his or her mental illness, the person is unwilling
or unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment that
would enable the person to live safely in the community without the
supervision of the court.
(e) Assisted outpatient treatment is the least restrictive
appropriate means to prevent further disability or deterioration that
would result in the person becoming a person in a mental health
crisis.
4. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 or a motion made
pursuant to subsection 2 must be accompanied by:
(a) A sworn statement or a declaration that complies with the
provisions of NRS 53.045 by a physician, a psychologist, a
physician assistant under the supervision of a psychiatrist, a clinical
social worker who has the psychiatric training and experience
prescribed by the Board of [Examiners for Social Workers]
Behavioral Health Professionals pursuant to NRS 641B.160 or an
advanced practice registered nurse who has the psychiatric training
and experience prescribed by the State Board of Nursing pursuant to
NRS 632.120, stating that he or she:
(1) Evaluated the person who is the subject of the petition or
motion not earlier than 10 days before the filing of the petition or
making of the motion;
(2) Recommends that the person be ordered to receive
assisted outpatient treatment; and
(3) Is willing and able to testify at a hearing on the petition or
motion; and
(b) A sworn statement or a declaration that complies with the
provisions of NRS 53.045 from a person professionally qualified in
the field of psychiatric mental health stating that he or she is willing
-
*SB425*

– 45 –
to provide assisted outpatient treatment for the person in the county
where the person resides.
5. A copy of the petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 or the
motion made pursuant to subsection 2 must be served upon the
person who is the subject of the petition or motion or his or her
counsel and, if applicable, his or her legal guardian.
Sec. 55. NRS 484C.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.300 1. Before sentencing an offender for a violation of
NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable as a felony pursuant
to NRS 484C.400 or 484C.410, other than an offender who has been
evaluated pursuant to NRS 484C.340, or a violation of NRS
484C.130 or 484C.430, the court shall require that the offender be
evaluated to determine whether the offender has an alcohol or other
substance use disorder and whether the offender can be treated
successfully for the condition.
2. The evaluation must be conducted by:
(a) An alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed or certified,
or a clinical alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed, pursuant to
chapter 641C of NRS, to make such an evaluation;
(b) A physician who is certified to make such an evaluation by
the Board of Medical Examiners;
(c) An advanced practice registered nurse who is certified to
make such an evaluation by the State Board of Nursing; or
(d) A psychologist who is certified to make such an evaluation
by the Board of [Psychological Examiners.] Behavioral Health
Professionals.
3. The alcohol and drug counselor, clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, physician, advanced practice registered nurse or
psychologist who conducts the evaluation shall immediately forward
the results of the evaluation to the Director of the Department of
Corrections or, if the offender is assigned to any specialty court or
diversionary program, to the court having jurisdiction over the
offender.
Sec. 56. NRS 488.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.430 1. Before sentencing a defendant pursuant to NRS
488.420, 488.425 or 488.427, the court shall require that the
defendant be evaluated to determine whether the defendant has an
alcohol or other substance use disorder and whether the defendant
can be treated successfully for his or her condition.
2. The evaluation must be conducted by:
(a) An alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed or certified,
or a clinical alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed, pursuant to
chapter 641C of NRS, to make such an evaluation;
(b) A physician who is certified to make such an evaluation by
the Board of Medical Examiners; or
-
*SB425*

– 46 –
(c) A psychologist who is certified to make such an evaluation
by the Board of [Psychological Examiners.] Behavioral Health
Professionals.
3. The alcohol and drug counselor, clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, physician or psychologist who conducts the evaluation
shall immediately forward the results of the evaluation to the
Director of the Department of Corrections.
Sec. 57. NRS 608.0116 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.0116 “Professional” means pertaining to:
1. An employee who is licensed or certified by the State of
Nevada for and engaged in the practice of law or any of the
professions regulated by chapters 623 to 645, inclusive, and the
chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this act, 645G
and 656A of NRS.
2. A creative professional as described in 29 C.F.R. § 541.302
who is not an employee of a contractor as that term is defined in
NRS 624.020.
Sec. 58. Title 54 of NRS is hereby amended by adding thereto
a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as sections 59 to
78, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 59. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 60, 61 and 62 of
this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 60. “Board” means the Board of Behavioral Health
Professionals created by section 63 of this act.
Sec. 61. “Director” means the Director of the Office.
Sec. 62. “Office” means the State Office of Health Care
Workforce and Licensing established within the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services by section 6 of this act.
Sec. 63. 1. The Board of Behavioral Health Professionals
is hereby created within the Office.
2. The Board consists of:
(a) Six members appointed by the Director who are licensed to
practice in this State as:
(1) A psychologist;
(2) A marriage and family therapist;
(3) A clinical professional counselor;
(4) A clinical social worker;
(5) A clinical alcohol and drug counselor; or
(6) A behavior analyst.
(b) Two members appointed by the Director who are who are
licensed or certified, as applicable, to practice in this State as:
(1) A social worker;
(2) A master social worker;
-
*SB425*

– 47 –
(3) An independent social worker;
(4) An alcohol and drug counselor;
(5) A problem gambling counselor; or
(6) An assistant behavior analyst.
(c) Two members appointed by the Director who are not
licensed, certified or registered pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS and who hold a leadership position in:
(1) A nonprofit organization that advocates for consumers
of behavioral health services;
(2) An entity that employs persons licensed pursuant to any
of chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS;
(3) An insurer or other entity that provides coverage for
behavioral health services;
(4) An institution of higher education that conducts
research relating to public health, epidemiology of behavioral
health, the economics of health care, the health care workforce or
other issues relating to behavioral health;
(5) An institution of higher education or other entity that
provides the education and training necessary to obtain a license,
certification or registration pursuant to any of chapters 641 to
641D, inclusive, of NRS;
(6) A facility licensed pursuant to chapter 449 of NRS;
(7) A foster care agency, as defined in NRS 424.0135;
(8) A group foster home, as defined in NRS 424.015;
(9) An independent living foster home, as defined in
NRS 424.0153;
(10) A receiving center, as defined in NRS 424.0175;
(11) A child care institution, as defined in NRS 432A.0245;
(12) A provider of jobs and day training services, as defined
in NRS 435.176; or
(13) A provider of supported living arrangement services,
as defined in NRS 435.3315.
(d) One member appointed by the Director who is:
(1) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of
NRS;
(2) A physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630
or 633 of NRS; or
(3) A professional nurse or practical nurse licensed
pursuant to chapter 632 of NRS.
(e) One member appointed by the Director of the Department
of Health and Human Services as a representative of the
Department.
3. When appointing the members of the Board described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (d) of subsection 2, the Director shall
solicit nominees from one or more applicable professional
-
*SB425*

– 48 –
associations in this State. To the extent practicable, such an
applicable professional association shall provide nominees who
represent the geographic diversity of this State. The Director may
appoint any qualified person to the Board, without regard to
whether the person is nominated pursuant to this subsection.
4. After the initial term, the term of each member of the
Board is 4 years, and the appointing authority may remove a
member for good cause. No member of the Board may serve more
than two consecutive terms. Any vacancy occurring in the
membership of the Board must be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
Sec. 64. 1. The Board shall hold a regular meeting at least
once a year. The Board shall hold a special meeting upon a call of
the President or upon the request of a majority of the members. A
majority of the Board constitutes a quorum.
2. At the regular annual meeting, the Board shall elect from
its membership a President and a Secretary-Treasurer, who shall
hold office for 1 year and until the election and qualification of
their successors.
3. In a manner consistent with the provisions of chapter 622A
of NRS, the Board may hold hearings and conduct investigations
related to its duties under this chapter and chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS and take evidence on any matter under inquiry
before it.
Sec. 65. The Board shall require each new member of the
Board to complete orientation within 60 days after his or her
appointment to the Board. Such orientation must include, without
limitation, instruction concerning:
1. The purpose of the Board and the duties of its members;
2. Any applicable laws and regulations, including, without
limitation, the provisions of chapters 622, 622A, 629 and 641 to
641D, inclusive, of NRS, and the importance of complying with
applicable laws and regulations in a timely manner; and
3. Any requirements relating to managing the finances of the
Board.
Sec. 66. 1. Each member of the Board is entitled to receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $150 per day, as fixed by the
Director, while engaged in the business of the Board; and
(b) The per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
2. Compensation and expenses of the members of the Board
and the persons employed by the Director on behalf of the Board
are payable only out of the money derived from fees paid or
transmitted to the Board pursuant to the provisions of chapters
641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
-
*SB425*

– 49 –
Sec. 67. 1. The Secretary-Treasurer shall make and keep
on behalf of the Board:
(a) A record of all its meetings and proceedings.
(b) A record of all violations and prosecutions under the
provisions of chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
(c) A record of all examinations of applicants.
(d) A register of all licenses, certificates and registrations.
(e) A register of all holders of licenses, certificates and
registrations.
(f) An inventory of the property of the Board and of the State
in the Board’s possession.
2. The records described in subsection 1 must be kept in the
office of the Board and, except as otherwise provided in this
section, are subject to public inspection during normal working
hours upon reasonable notice.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, the Board
may keep the personnel records of applicants confidential.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section and NRS
239.0115, a complaint filed with the Board, all documents and
other information filed with the complaint and all documents and
other information compiled as a result of an investigation
conducted to determine whether to initiate disciplinary action
against a person are confidential, unless the person submits a
written statement to the Board requesting that such documents
and information be made public records.
5. The charging documents filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all other
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
6. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the Board
from communicating or cooperating with or providing any
documents or other information to any other licensing board or
any other agency that is investigating a person, including, without
limitation, a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 68. 1. The Director, on behalf of the Board, may
accept any gift, donation, bequest, grant or other source of money
for the purpose of carrying out its duties pursuant to this chapter
and chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
2. Money received from the licensure, certification and
registration of persons pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS, civil penalties collected pursuant to chapters
641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS and any appropriation, gift, grant,
donation or other money received by the Director for purposes
relating to the duties of the Board under the provisions of this
chapter and chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS must be
-
*SB425*

– 50 –
forwarded to the State Treasurer for deposit in the State General
Fund to the credit of the Office. Such money must be:
(a) Accounted for separately in the State General Fund; and
(b) Used exclusively for payment of compensation and
expenses of the members of the Board and persons employed by
the Director on behalf of the Board, the per diem and travel
allowance for members of the Advisory Committees created by
sections 71, 73 and 75 of this act and for any other necessary
purpose in the administration of this chapter and chapters 641 to
641D, inclusive, of NRS.
Sec. 69. 1. The Director, on behalf of the Board, may:
(a) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it
considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and
chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
(b) Employ attorneys, investigators, consultants, hearing
officers and employees necessary to the discharge of the duties of
the Board.
2. The Director, on behalf of the Board, may contract with
any appropriate public or private agency, organization or
institution in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter and
chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS. The purposes of such a
contract may include, without limitation:
(a) To obtain assistance in processing applications for the
issuance or renewal of a license, certificate or registration;
(b) To obtain technical assistance;
(c) To facilitate cooperation with another board or licensing
entity in this State or any other jurisdiction;
(d) To obtain recommendations to improve and standardize
procedures used by the Board; and
(e) To obtain assistance in identifying resources for improving
the operations of the Board.
3. Any person whom the Director employs on behalf of the
Board or any person or entity with which the Director contracts on
behalf of the Board shall be deemed an employee or contractor, as
applicable, of the Board for the purposes of this title.
Sec. 70. 1. On or before February 1 of each year, the
Board shall submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Health and Human Services and to the Chair of each regional
behavioral health policy board created by NRS 433.429 a report
which must include:
(a) The number of complaints received, investigations
completed, cases dismissed, cases settled and cases for which
hearings were held within the immediately preceding calendar
year;
-
*SB425*

– 51 –
(b) The number of applications for the issuance or renewal of
a license, certificate or registration received by the Board during
the immediately preceding calendar year and the number of those
applications for which the Board conducted additional review
beyond the standard review regularly conducted by the Board; and
(c) The number of applications for the issuance of a license or
certificate by endorsement received by the Board during the
immediately preceding calendar year, the number of those
applications that were denied and the reasons for denial.
2. The report described in subsection 1 must present the
information described in subsection 1:
(a) Aggregated for all licenses, certificates and registrations
issued by the Board; and
(b) Disaggregated for each type of license, certificate or
registration issued by the Board.
3. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the Chair
of each regional behavioral health policy board created by NRS
433.429 may be submitted in a written format.
Sec. 71. 1. The Qualifications and Professional
Development Advisory Committee is hereby created.
2. The Board shall appoint to the Advisory Committee:
(a) One member of the Board, who shall serve as chair of the
Advisory Committee;
(b) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641 of
NRS;
(c) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of
NRS;
(d) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of
NRS;
(e) One member who is licensed or certified pursuant to
chapter 641C of NRS;
(f) One member who is licensed or registered pursuant to
chapter 641D of NRS;
(g) One member who provides the education and training
necessary to obtain a license pursuant to chapter 641 of NRS;
(h) One member who provides the education and training
necessary to obtain a license pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS;
(i) One member who provides the education and training
necessary to obtain a license pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
(j) One member who provides the education and training
necessary to obtain a license or certificate pursuant to chapter
641C of NRS;
(k) One member who provides the education and training
necessary to obtain a license or registration pursuant to chapter
641D of NRS; and
-
*SB425*

– 52 –
(l) Any additional members provided for in the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection 3.
3. The Board may, by regulation, provide for the appointment
of additional members of the Advisory Committee. Such additional
members must be persons who are licensed, certified or registered
pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS. If the Board
adopts regulations providing for the appointment of such an
additional member, the Board shall appoint the additional member
to an initial term that:
(a) Begins on January 1 immediately following the date of the
appointment; and
(b) Is of such duration that the term is consistent with the
manner in which the terms of the other members of the Advisory
Committee are staggered.
Sec. 72. The Qualifications and Professional Development
Advisory Committee created by section 71 of this act shall:
1. Advise the Board concerning qualifications for licensure,
certification and registration pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS, including, without limitation:
(a) Passing scores on examinations required for licensure,
certification or registration; and
(b) Standards for the supervision of students or persons in
training to become licensed, certified or registered.
2. Recommend to the Board evidence-based requirements for
continuing education and other professional development for
persons licensed, certified and registered pursuant to chapters 641
to 641D, inclusive, of NRS that:
(a) Ensure an adequate number of persons are licensed,
certified and registered pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS to meet the demand of consumers in this State;
and
(b) Protect the health, safety and financial welfare of the
public.
3. Advise the Board concerning the licensure, certification
and registration pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of
NRS of:
(a) Persons who received their education or training outside of
the United States;
(b) Persons who are licensed in other jurisdictions of the
United States, including, without limitation, applicants for
licensure or certification by endorsement; and
(c) Other applicants for licensure, certification or registration
through nontraditional means.
4. Make such other recommendations to the Board
concerning qualifications for the issuance or renewal of a license,
-
*SB425*

– 53 –
certificate or registration pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS as the Advisory Committee deems proper.
5. Upon the request of the Board:
(a) Make recommendations to the Board concerning a specific
applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license, certificate or
registration pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS;
(b) Appoint a member of the Advisory Committee who is
licensed, certified or registered pursuant to any of chapters 641 to
641D, inclusive, of NRS to provide subject matter expertise to the
Board concerning the matters described in subsections 1 to 4,
inclusive, as they relate to the chapter of NRS pursuant to which
the appointed member is licensed, certified or registered, as
applicable; or
(c) Appoint a member of the Advisory Committee who is
licensed, certified or registered pursuant to the same chapter of
NRS as a specific applicant for the issuance or renewal of a
license, certificate or registration pursuant to chapters 641 to
641D, inclusive, of NRS to make recommendations to the Board
concerning the applicant.
Sec. 73. 1. The Background and Investigations Advisory
Committee is hereby created.
2. The Board shall appoint to the Advisory Committee:
(a) One member of the Board, who shall serve as chair of the
Advisory Committee;
(b) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641 of
NRS;
(c) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of
NRS;
(d) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of
NRS;
(e) One member who is licensed or certified pursuant to
chapter 641C of NRS;
(f) One member who is licensed or registered pursuant to
chapter 641D of NRS;
(g) One member who is a professional in the field of criminal
justice; and
(h) Any additional members provided for in the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection 3.
3. The Board may, by regulation, provide for the appointment
of additional members of the Advisory Committee. Such additional
members must be persons who are licensed, certified or registered
pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS. If the Board
adopts regulations providing for the appointment of such an
additional member, the Board shall appoint the additional member
to an initial term that:
-
*SB425*

– 54 –
(a) Begins on January 1 immediately following the date of the
appointment; and
(b) Is of such duration that the term is consistent with the
manner in which the terms of the other members of the Advisory
Committee are staggered.
Sec. 74. The Background and Investigations Advisory
Committee created by section 73 of this act shall:
1. Advise the Board concerning:
(a) The adoption of regulations establishing criteria for the
licensure, certification or registration pursuant to chapters 641 to
641D, inclusive, of NRS of persons who have been convicted of
crimes; and
(b) The establishment of criteria for referring persons who are
licensed, certified or registered pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS to:
(1) Programs for the treatment of substance use disorders
or mental health conditions; or
(2) Programs to provide professional assistance.
2. Assist the Board in screening applicants for the issuance
or renewal of a license, certificate or registration pursuant to
chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS for their criminal history.
3. Make recommendations to the Board concerning the
issuance, renewal or reinstatement of a license, certificate or
registration pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS
where the applicant has been convicted of a crime.
4. Advise the Board concerning practices and procedures for
investigations and the imposition of disciplinary action to ensure
consistency and fairness across each profession regulated under
the provisions of chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
5. Upon the request of the Board:
(a) Make recommendations to the Board concerning a specific
investigation or disciplinary proceeding conducted pursuant to
chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS; or
(b) Appoint a member of the Advisory Committee who is
licensed, certified or registered pursuant to the same chapter of
NRS as a specific person who is the subject of an investigation or
disciplinary proceeding conducted pursuant to chapters 641 to
641D, inclusive, of NRS to make recommendations to the Board
concerning the investigation or disciplinary proceeding.
Sec. 75. 1. The Probation and Compliance Advisory
Committee is hereby created.
2. The Board shall appoint to the Advisory Committee:
(a) One member of the Board, who shall serve as chair of the
Advisory Committee;
-
*SB425*

– 55 –
(b) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641 of
NRS;
(c) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of
NRS;
(d) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of
NRS;
(e) One member who is licensed or certified pursuant to
chapter 641C of NRS;
(f) One member who is licensed or registered pursuant to
chapter 641D of NRS; and
(g) Any additional members provided for in the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection 3.
3. The Board may, by regulation, provide for the appointment
of additional members of the Advisory Committee. Such additional
members must be persons who are licensed, certified or registered
pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS. If the Board
adopts regulations providing for the appointment of such an
additional member, the Board shall appoint the additional member
to an initial term that:
(a) Begins on January 1 immediately following the date of the
appointment; and
(b) Is of such duration that the term is consistent with the
manner in which the terms of the other members of the Advisory
Committee are staggered.
Sec. 76. The Probation and Compliance Advisory Committee
created by section 75 of this act shall:
1. Review compliance with orders imposing disciplinary
action issued pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
2. Advise the Board concerning the screening of applicants
for the issuance or renewal of a license, certificate or registration
pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS who have
previously been subject to disciplinary action in this State or
another jurisdiction.
3. Recommend to the Board procedures for monitoring
compliance with orders imposing disciplinary action pursuant to
chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
4. Upon the request of the Board:
(a) Make recommendations to the Board concerning the
compliance of a specific person with an order imposing
disciplinary action pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of
NRS or the early termination of such an order;
(b) Make recommendations to the Board concerning a specific
applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license, certificate or
registration pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of NRS
-
*SB425*

– 56 –
who has previously been subject to disciplinary action in this State
or another jurisdiction; or
(c) Appoint a member of the Advisory Committee who is
licensed, certified or registered pursuant to the same chapter of
NRS as a specific person who is the subject of an order imposing
disciplinary action issued pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D,
inclusive, of NRS to make recommendations to the Board
concerning the compliance of the person with the order or the
early termination of the order.
Sec. 77. 1. The Board shall ensure that, insofar as
practicable, the members whom the Board appoints to each
Advisory Committee reflect the ethnic and geographical diversity
of this State.
2. The members of each Advisory Committee serve without
compensation, except that each member is entitled, while engaged
in the business of the Advisory Committee to the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally.
3. A member of an Advisory Committee who is an officer or
employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must
be relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular
compensation to prepare for and attend meetings of the Advisory
Committee and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties
of the Advisory Committee in the most timely manner practicable.
A state agency or political subdivision of this State shall not
require an officer or employee who is a member of an Advisory
Committee appointed pursuant to this chapter to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry
out his or her duties as a member of the Advisory Committee; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
4. After the initial term, the term of each member of an
Advisory Committee is 3 years. A member may be reappointed to
additional terms of 3 years in the same manner as the original
appointment. Any vacancy in the membership of an Advisory
Committee must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
5. An Advisory Committee shall meet at the call of the Chair.
6. A majority of the members of an Advisory Committee
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a
majority of a quorum present at any meeting is sufficient for any
official action taken by the Advisory Committee.
7. An Advisory Committee may obtain advice from subject
matter experts to the extent necessary or convenient to carry out
the duties of the Advisory Committee.
8. As used in this section, “Advisory Committee” means:
-
*SB425*

– 57 –
(a) The Qualifications and Professional Development Advisory
Committee created by section 71 of this act;
(b) The Background and Investigations Advisory Committee
created by section 73 of this act; and
(c) The Probation and Compliance Advisory Committee
created by section 75 of this act.
Sec. 78. The Director, in consultation with the Board, may
establish additional advisory committees on a permanent or
temporary basis to advise the Board concerning any aspect of its
duties under this chapter and chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive, of
NRS, including, without limitation:
1. The access of patients or clients to the holders of licenses,
certificates or registrations;
2. The education, examination and supervision of applicants
for licensure, certification or registration;
3. Verification of the qualifications of applicants for
licensure, certification or registration;
4. Requirements for continuing education for the holders of
licenses, certificates or registrations;
5. Alternate pathways to licensure, certification or
registration; and
6. Assisting the holders of licenses, certificates and
registration with:
(a) Compliance with disciplinary orders imposing probation or
similar conditions; or
(b) Recovery from mental health disorders and substance use
disorders.
Sec. 79. NRS 622.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
622.200 1. As soon as practicable after a person is first
appointed to serve as a member of a regulatory body, the person
must be provided with:
(a) A written summary of the duties and responsibilities of a
member of the regulatory body; and
(b) Training on those duties and responsibilities by the Attorney
General. The training must include, without limitation, instruction
related to the audit that is required by NRS 218G.400, except that a
person who is a member of the Nevada State Board of Accountancy
or the Board of Behavioral Health Professionals is not required to
be provided with instruction related to that audit.
2. The Attorney General may, in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 228.113, charge a regulatory body for all training
provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
Sec. 80. NRS 622A.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
622A.120 1. The following regulatory bodies are exempted
from the provisions of this chapter:
-
*SB425*

– 58 –
(a) State Contractors’ Board.
(b) Real Estate Commission, Real Estate Administrator and Real
Estate Division of the Department of Business and Industry.
(c) Commission of Appraisers of Real Estate.
(d) Commissioner of Mortgage Lending and Division of
Mortgage Lending of the Department of Business and Industry.
(e) Commissioner of Financial Institutions and Division of
Financial Institutions of the Department of Business and Industry.
(f) State Board of Health and Division of Public and Behavioral
Health of the Department of Health and Human Services [.] , except
that the Board of Behavioral Health Professionals of the Office of
Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division is subject to
the provisions of this chapter.
2. Any regulatory body which is exempted from the provisions
of this chapter pursuant to subsection 1 may elect by regulation to
follow the provisions of this chapter or any portion thereof.
Sec. 81. NRS 629.051 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.051 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
in regulations adopted by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS
652.135 with regard to the records of a medical laboratory and
unless a longer period is provided by federal law, each custodian of
health care records shall retain the health care records of patients as
part of the regularly maintained records of the custodian for 5 years
after their receipt or production. Health care records may be retained
in written form, or by microfilm or any other recognized form of
size reduction, including, without limitation, microfiche, computer
disc, magnetic tape and optical disc, which does not adversely affect
their use for the purposes of NRS 629.061. Health care records:
(a) Must, except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and 6 of
NRS 439.589, be created, maintained, transmitted and exchanged
electronically as required by subsection 4 of NRS 439.589; and
(b) May be created, authenticated and stored in a health
information exchange which meets the requirements of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
2. A provider of health care shall post, in a conspicuous place
in each location at which the provider of health care performs health
care services, a sign which discloses to patients that their health care
records may be destroyed after the period set forth in subsection 1.
3. When a provider of health care performs health care services
for a patient for the first time, the provider of health care shall
deliver to the patient a written statement which discloses to the
patient that the health care records of the patient may be destroyed
after the period set forth in subsection 1.
-
*SB425*

– 59 –
4. If a provider of health care fails to deliver the written
statement to the patient pursuant to subsection 3, the provider of
health care shall deliver to the patient the written statement
described in subsection 3 when the provider of health care next
performs health care services for the patient.
5. In addition to delivering a written statement pursuant to
subsection 3 or 4, a provider of health care may deliver such a
written statement to a patient at any other time.
6. A written statement delivered to a patient pursuant to this
section may be included with other written information delivered to
the patient by a provider of health care.
7. A custodian of health care records shall not destroy the
health care records of a person who is less than 23 years of age on
the date of the proposed destruction of the records. The health care
records of a person who has attained the age of 23 years may be
destroyed in accordance with this section for those records which
have been retained for at least 5 years or for any longer period
provided by federal law.
8. If a health care licensing board receives notification from the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439.5895 that a provider of health care to which the health care
licensing board has issued a license is not in compliance with the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, the health care
licensing board may, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing
in accordance with the provisions of this title, require corrective
action or impose an administrative penalty in an amount not to
exceed the maximum penalty that the health care licensing board is
authorized to impose for other violations. The health care licensing
board shall not suspend or revoke a license for failure to comply
with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589.
9. The provisions of this section, except for the provisions of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and subsection 8, do not apply to a
pharmacist.
10. The State Board of Health shall adopt:
(a) Regulations prescribing the form, size, contents and
placement of the signs and written statements required pursuant to
this section; and
(b) Any other regulations necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B [,] or
640C [, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D] of NRS [.] or the chapter
consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this act.
-
*SB425*

– 60 –
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) The State Board of Health with respect to licenses issued
pursuant to chapter 640D or 640E of NRS.
(b) “License” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 439.5895.
Sec. 82. NRS 629.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.053 1. The State Board of Health and each board created
pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632, 633, 634, 634A, 635, 636,
637, 637B, 640, 640A, 640B [,] or 640C [, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C
or 641D] of NRS or the chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78,
inclusive, of this act shall post on its website on the Internet, if any,
a statement which discloses that:
(a) Pursuant to the provisions of subsection 7 of NRS 629.051:
(1) The health care records of a person who is less than 23
years of age may not be destroyed; and
(2) The health care records of a person who has attained the
age of 23 years may be destroyed for those records which have been
retained for at least 5 years or for any longer period provided by
federal law; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 of NRS
629.051 and unless a longer period is provided by federal law, the
health care records of a patient who is 23 years of age or older may
be destroyed after 5 years pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 629.051.
2. The State Board of Health shall adopt regulations
prescribing the contents of the statements required pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 83. NRS 629.079 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.079 1. If a health care licensing board determines that a
complaint received by the health care licensing board concerns a
matter within the jurisdiction of another health care licensing board,
the health care licensing board which received the complaint shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), refer the
complaint to the other health care licensing board within 5 days after
making the determination; and
(b) If the health care licensing board also determines that the
complaint concerns an emergency situation, immediately refer the
complaint to the other health care licensing board.
2. If a health care licensing board determines that a complaint
received by the health care licensing board concerns a public health
emergency or other health event that is an immediate threat to the
health and safety of the public in a health care facility or the office
of a provider of health care, the health care licensing board shall
immediately notify the appropriate health authority for the purposes
of NRS 439.970.
-
*SB425*

– 61 –
3. A health care licensing board may refer a complaint pursuant
to subsection 1 or provide notification pursuant to subsection 2
orally, electronically or in writing.
4. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 apply to any
complaint received by a health care licensing board, including,
without limitation:
(a) A complaint which concerns a person who or entity which is
licensed, certified or otherwise regulated by the health care licensing
board that received the complaint and by another health care
licensing board; and
(b) A complaint which concerns a person who or entity which is
licensed, certified or otherwise regulated solely by another health
care licensing board.
5. The provisions of this section do not prevent a health care
licensing board from acting upon a complaint which concerns a
matter within the jurisdiction of the health care licensing board
regardless of whether the health care licensing board refers the
complaint pursuant to subsection 1 or provides notification based
upon the complaint pursuant to subsection 2.
6. A health care licensing board or an officer or employee of
the health care licensing board is immune from any civil liability for
any decision or action taken in good faith and without malicious
intent in carrying out the provisions of this section.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS.
(b) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C,
640D [,] or 640E [, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D] of NRS [.] or
the chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this act.
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 84. NRS 629.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.250 1. A health care licensing board shall not disqualify
a person from licensure or subject any person to discipline solely:
(a) For providing or assisting in the provision of reproductive
health care services; or
(b) As a consequence of any judgment, discipline or other
sanction threatened or imposed under the laws of the District of
Columbia or any state or territory of the United States for providing
or assisting in the provision of reproductive health care services,
 if the reproductive health care services as provided would have
been lawful and consistent with standards for the practice of the
relevant profession in this State.
-
*SB425*

– 62 –
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C,
640D [,] or 640E [, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D] of NRS [.] or
the chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this act.
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) “Reproductive health care services” means medical, surgical,
counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive
system, including, without limitation, services relating to pregnancy,
contraception, the termination of pregnancy or any procedure or
care found by a competent medical professional to be appropriate
based upon the wishes of a patient and in accordance with the laws
of this State.
Sec. 85. NRS 630.2671 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2671 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for a biennial registration pursuant to NRS 630.267 or the renewal
of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic
application for a biennial registration or the renewal of a license;
and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for a biennial
registration or the renewal of a license pursuant to subsection 1 is
confidential and, except as required by subsection 1, must not be
disclosed to any person or entity.
3. An applicant for a biennial registration or the renewal of a
license is not required to complete a data request pursuant to
subsection 1 and is not subject to disciplinary action, including,
without limitation, refusal to issue the biennial registration or renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 86. NRS 630A.327 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.327 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter
through a link on the electronic application for the renewal of a
license or certificate; and
-
*SB425*

– 63 –
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license or certificate pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.
Sec. 87. NRS 631.332 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.332 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 88. NRS 632.3423 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.3423 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter
through a link on the electronic application for the renewal of a
license or certificate; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license or certificate pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
-
*SB425*

– 64 –
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.
Sec. 89. NRS 633.4716 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4716 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 90. NRS 634.1303 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.1303 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter
through a link on the electronic application for the renewal of a
license or certificate; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license or certificate pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.
Sec. 91. NRS 634A.169 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634A.169 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
-
*SB425*

– 65 –
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 92. NRS 635.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
635.111 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 93. NRS 636.262 is hereby amended to read as follows:
636.262 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
-
*SB425*

– 66 –
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 94. NRS 637.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637.145 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 95. NRS 637B.192 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.192 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 96. NRS 639.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.183 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
-
*SB425*

– 67 –
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of registration as a pharmacist, intern pharmacist,
pharmaceutical technician or pharmaceutical technician in training
through a link on the electronic application for the renewal of a
registration; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a registration pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a registration is not required
to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not
subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal
to renew the registration, for failure to do so.
Sec. 97. NRS 640.152 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640.152 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 98. NRS 640A.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640A.185 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
-
*SB425*

– 68 –
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 99. NRS 640B.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640B.405 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 100. NRS 640D.135 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
640D.135 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
-
*SB425*

– 69 –
Sec. 101. NRS 640E.225 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
640E.225 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 102. NRS 641.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.021 “Board” means the Board of [Psychological
Examiners.] Behavioral Health Professionals.
Sec. 103. NRS 641.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.029 1. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
[1.] (a) A physician who is licensed to practice in this State;
[2.] (b) A person who is licensed to practice dentistry in this
State;
[3.] (c) A person who is licensed as a marriage and family
therapist or marriage and family therapist intern pursuant to chapter
641A of NRS;
[4.] (d) A person who is licensed as a clinical professional
counselor or clinical professional counselor intern pursuant to
chapter 641A of NRS;
[5.] (e) A person who is licensed to engage in social work
pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
[6.] (f) A person who is licensed as an occupational therapist or
occupational therapy assistant pursuant to chapter 640A of NRS;
[7.] (g) A person who is licensed as a clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, licensed or certified as an alcohol and drug counselor or
certified as an alcohol and drug counselor intern, a clinical alcohol
and drug counselor intern, a problem gambling counselor or a
problem gambling counselor intern, pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
-
*SB425*

– 70 –
[8.] (h) A person who provides or supervises the provision of
peer recovery support services in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 433.622 to 433.641, inclusive;
[9.] (i) A person who is licensed as a behavior analyst or an
assistant behavior analyst or registered as a registered behavior
technician pursuant to chapter 641D of NRS, while engaged in the
practice of applied behavior analysis as defined in NRS 641D.080;
or
[10.] (j) Any member of the clergy,
 if such a person does not commit an act described in NRS
641.440 or represent himself or herself as a psychologist.
2. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any license, certificate or registration issued pursuant to
chapters 641A to 641D, inclusive, of NRS;
(b) The adoption of regulations pursuant to chapters 641A to
641D, inclusive, of NRS;
(c) Any investigation or disciplinary proceeding conducted
pursuant to chapters 641A to 641D, inclusive, of NRS; or
(d) Any other activity of the Board conducted pursuant to
chapters 641A to 641D, inclusive, of NRS.
Sec. 104. NRS 641.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.110 1. The Board may, under the provisions of this
chapter:
(a) Examine and pass upon the qualifications of the applicants
for licensure.
(b) License qualified applicants.
(c) Register a person as a psychological assistant, psychological
intern or psychological trainee.
(d) Revoke or suspend licenses and registrations.
(e) Collect all fees [and make disbursements] pursuant to this
chapter.
2. [The] A member of the Board who is [a representative of the
general public] not licensed pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter shall not participate in preparing, conducting or grading any
examination required by the Board [.] pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 105. NRS 641.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.190 The Board may:
1. Grant a license as a psychologist without any examination to
any person certified or licensed by a board of psychological
examiners or other regulatory entity responsible for the regulation
of psychologists of another state , the District of Columbia or
another territory of the United States if the Board determines that
the requirements in that [state] jurisdiction are at least equivalent to
the requirements of this chapter.
-
*SB425*

– 71 –
2. Authorize a psychologist licensed or certified pursuant to the
laws of another state , the District of Columbia or another territory
of the United States to practice psychology for 1 year or less if the
psychologist has:
(a) Made application to the Board for licensure;
(b) Met the requirements of education and experience for
licensure in this State; and
(c) Not been disciplined in another state , the District of
Columbia or another territory of the United States in connection
with a license to practice psychology or has not committed any act
in another state , the District of Columbia or another territory of
the United States which is a violation of this chapter.
Sec. 106. NRS 641.2215 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641.2215 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license or registration pursuant to this chapter
through a link on the electronic application for the renewal of a
license or registration; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license or registration pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or registration is
not required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and
is not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or registration, for failure to do so.
Sec. 107. Chapter 641A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. Any license, certificate or registration issued pursuant to
chapter 641, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS;
2. The adoption of regulations pursuant to chapter 641,
641B, 641C or 641D of NRS;
3. Any investigation or disciplinary proceeding conducted
pursuant to chapter 641, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS; or
4. Any other activity of the Board conducted pursuant to
chapter 641, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS.
-
*SB425*

– 72 –
Sec. 108. NRS 641A.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641A.030 “Board” means the Board of [Examiners for
Marriage and Family Therapists and Clinical Professional
Counselors.] Behavioral Health Professionals.
Sec. 109. NRS 641A.170 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641A.170 1. The Board shall under the provisions of this
chapter:
(a) Examine and pass upon the qualifications of the applicants
for licensing.
(b) License qualified applicants.
(c) Revoke or suspend licenses.
(d) Establish requirements for continuing education.
(e) Collect all fees [and make disbursements] pursuant to this
chapter.
2. [The members] A member of the Board who [are
representatives of the general public] is not licensed pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter shall not participate in preparing,
conducting or grading any examination required by the Board [.]
pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 110. NRS 641A.217 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641A.217 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 111. NRS 641B.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.030 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
-
*SB425*

– 73 –
1. “Board” means the Board of [Examiners for Social
Workers.] Behavioral Health Professionals.
2. “Social work” means the application of methods, principles
and techniques of case work, group work, community organization,
administration, planning, consultation and research to assist persons,
groups or communities to enhance or restore their ability to function
physically, socially and economically.
3. “Clinical social work” means the application of methods,
principles and techniques of case work, group work, community
organization, administration, planning, consultation, research and
psychotherapeutic methods and techniques to persons, families
and groups to help in the diagnosis and treatment of mental and
emotional conditions.
Sec. 112. NRS 641B.040 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.040 1. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
[1.] (a) A physician who is licensed to practice in this State;
[2.] (b) A nurse who is licensed to practice in this State;
[3.] (c) A person who is licensed as a psychologist pursuant to
chapter 641 of NRS or authorized to practice psychology in this
State pursuant to the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
enacted in NRS 641.227;
[4.] (d) A person who is licensed as a marriage and family
therapist or marriage and family therapist intern pursuant to chapter
641A of NRS;
[5.] (e) A person who is licensed as a clinical professional
counselor or clinical professional counselor intern pursuant to
chapter 641A of NRS;
[6.] (f) A person who is licensed as an occupational therapist or
occupational therapy assistant pursuant to chapter 640A of NRS;
[7.] (g) A person who is licensed as a clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, licensed or certified as an alcohol and drug counselor or
certified as a clinical alcohol and drug counselor intern, an alcohol
and drug counselor intern, a problem gambling counselor or a
problem gambling counselor intern, pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
[8.] (h) A person who provides or supervises the provision of
peer recovery support services in accordance with NRS 433.622 to
433.641, inclusive;
[9.] (i) Any member of the clergy;
[10.] (j) A county welfare director;
[11.] (k) Any person who may engage in social work or clinical
social work in his or her regular governmental employment but does
not hold himself or herself out to the public as a social worker; or
-
*SB425*

– 74 –
[12.] (l) A student of social work and any other person
preparing for the profession of social work under the supervision of
a qualified social worker in a training institution or facility
recognized by the Board, unless the student or other person has been
issued a provisional license pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection
1 of NRS 641B.275. Such a student must be designated by the title
“student of social work” or “trainee in social work,” or any other
title which clearly indicates the student’s training status.
2. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any license, certificate or registration issued pursuant to
chapter 641, 641A, 641C or 641D of NRS;
(b) The adoption of regulations pursuant to chapter 641, 641A,
641C or 641D of NRS;
(c) Any investigation or disciplinary proceeding conducted
pursuant to chapter 641, 641A, 641C or 641D of NRS; or
(d) Any other activity of the Board conducted pursuant to
chapter 641, 641A, 641C or 641D of NRS.
Sec. 113. NRS 641B.250 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.250 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 641B.270,
641B.272 and 641B.275, before the issuance of a license, each
applicant, otherwise eligible for licensure, who has paid the fee and
presented the required credentials, other than an applicant for a
license to engage in social work as an associate in social work, must
appear personally and pass an examination concerning his or her
knowledge of the practice of social work.
2. Any such examination must be fair and impartial, practical
in character with questions designed to discover the applicant’s
fitness.
3. The Director of the State Office of Health Care Workforce
and Licensure of the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of
the Department of Health and Human Services, on behalf of the
Board , may employ specialists and other professional consultants or
examining services in conducting the examination.
4. [The] A member of the Board who is [the representative of
the general public] not licensed pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter shall not participate in the grading of the examination.
5. The Board shall examine applicants for licensure at least
twice a year.
Sec. 114. NRS 641B.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.260 [1. The Board may hold hearings and conduct
investigations into any matter related to an application for licensure.
The Board may require the presentation of evidence.
-
*SB425*

– 75 –
2.] The Board may refuse to issue a license to an applicant if
the applicant:
[(a)] 1. Is not of good moral character as it relates to the
practice of social work;
[(b)] 2. Has submitted any false credential to the Board;
[(c)] 3. Has been disciplined in another state in connection
with the practice of social work or a related profession or has
committed any act in another state which is a violation of this
chapter;
[(d)] 4. Has committed an act that constitutes grounds for
initiating disciplinary action pursuant to NRS 641B.400;
[(e)] 5. Has entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill or
nolo contendere to, been found guilty or guilty but mentally ill of, or
been convicted, in this State or any other jurisdiction, of a crime
arising out of, in connection with or related to the activities of such
a person in such a manner as to demonstrate his or her unfitness to
engage in social work, and the time for appeal has elapsed or the
judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal; or
[(f)] 6. Fails to comply with any other requirements for
licensure.
Sec. 115. NRS 641B.281 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.281 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and, except as
required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any person or
entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.
Sec. 116. NRS 641C.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.030 “Board” means the Board of [Examiners for
Alcohol, Drug and Gambling Counselors.] Behavioral Health
Professionals.
-
*SB425*

– 76 –
Sec. 117. NRS 641C.130 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.130 1. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
[1.] (a) A physician who is licensed pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 630 or 633 of NRS;
[2.] (b) A nurse who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 632 of NRS and is authorized by the State Board of Nursing
to engage in the practice of counseling persons with alcohol and
other substance use disorders or the practice of counseling persons
with an addictive disorder related to gambling;
[3.] (c) A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 641 of NRS or authorized to practice
psychology in this State pursuant to the Psychology
Interjurisdictional Compact enacted in NRS 641.227;
[4.] (d) A clinical professional counselor or clinical professional
counselor intern who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS;
[5.] (e) A marriage and family therapist or marriage and family
therapist intern who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
641A of NRS and is authorized by the Board [of Examiners for
Marriage and Family Therapists and Clinical Professional
Counselors] to engage in the practice of counseling persons with
alcohol and other substance use disorders or the practice of
counseling persons with an addictive disorder related to gambling;
[6.] (f) A person who is:
[(a)] (1) Licensed as:
[(1)] (I) A clinical social worker pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 641B of NRS; or
[(2)] (II) A master social worker or an independent social
worker pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641B of NRS and is
engaging in clinical social work as part of an internship program
approved by the Board ; [of Examiners for Social Workers;] and
[(b)] (2) Authorized by the Board [of Examiners for Social
Workers] to engage in the practice of counseling persons with
alcohol and other substance use disorders or the practice of
counseling persons with an addictive disorder related to gambling;
or
[7.] (g) A person who provides or supervises the provision of
peer recovery support services in accordance with NRS 433.622 to
433.641, inclusive.
2. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any license, certificate or registration issued pursuant to
chapter 641, 641A, 641B or 641D of NRS;
(b) The adoption of regulations pursuant to chapter 641, 641A,
641B or 641D of NRS;
-
*SB425*

– 77 –
(c) Any investigation or disciplinary proceeding conducted
pursuant to chapter 641, 641A, 641B or 641D of NRS; or
(d) Any other activity of the Board conducted pursuant to
chapter 641, 641A, 641B or 641D of NRS.
Sec. 118. NRS 641C.190 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.190 [1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
all expenses incurred by the Board in carrying out the provisions of
this chapter must be paid from the money which it receives. No part
of the salaries or expenses of the Board may be paid out of the State
General Fund.
2. All money received by the Board must be deposited in a
bank, credit union or other financial institution in this State and paid
out on its order for its expenses.
3.] In a manner consistent with the provisions of chapter 622A
of NRS, the Board may delegate to a hearing officer or panel its
authority to take any disciplinary action pursuant to this chapter,
impose and collect fines and penalties therefor and [deposit]
forward the money therefrom [in a bank, credit union or other
financial institution in this State.
4. If a hearing officer or panel is not authorized to take
disciplinary action pursuant to subsection 3, the Board shall deposit
the money collected from the imposition of fines with the State
Treasurer for credit to the State General Fund. If money is so
deposited, the Board may present a claim to the State Board of
Examiners for recommendation to the Interim Finance Committee if
money is needed to pay attorney’s fees or the costs of an
investigation, or both.] to the State Treasurer in accordance with
section 68 of this act.
Sec. 119. NRS 641C.290 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.290 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 641C.300
and 641C.3306, each applicant for a license as a clinical alcohol and
drug counselor must pass a written and oral examination concerning
his or her knowledge of the clinical practice of counseling persons
with alcohol and other substance use disorders, the applicable
provisions of this chapter and any applicable regulations adopted by
the Board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 641C.300, 641C.356
and 641C.396, each applicant for a license or certificate as an
alcohol and drug counselor must pass a written and oral examination
concerning his or her knowledge of the practice of counseling
persons with alcohol and other substance use disorders, the
applicable provisions of this chapter and any applicable regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
-
*SB425*

– 78 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 641C.433, each
applicant for a certificate as a problem gambling counselor must
pass a written and oral examination concerning his or her
knowledge of the practice of counseling persons with an addictive
disorder related to gambling, the applicable provisions of this
chapter and any applicable regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
4. The Board shall:
(a) Examine applicants at least two times each year.
(b) Establish the time and place for the examinations.
(c) Provide such books and forms as may be necessary to
conduct the examinations.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 622.090, establish, by
regulation, the requirements for passing the examination.
5. The Director of the State Office of Health Care Workforce
and Licensure of the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of
the Department of Health and Human Services, on behalf of the
Board , may employ other persons to conduct the examinations.
Sec. 120. NRS 641C.310 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.310 [1. The Board may hold hearings and conduct
investigations concerning any matter related to an application for a
license or certificate. In the hearings and investigations, the Board
may require the presentation of evidence.
2.] The Board may refuse to issue a license or certificate to, or
renew the license or certificate of, an applicant if the Board
determines that the applicant:
[(a)] 1. Is not of good moral character as it relates to the
practice of counseling persons with alcohol and other substance use
disorders or the clinical practice of counseling persons with alcohol
and other substance use disorders;
[(b)] 2. Has submitted a false credential to the Board;
[(c)] 3. Has been disciplined in another state, a possession or
territory of the United States or the District of Columbia in
connection with the practice of counseling persons with alcohol and
other substance use disorders or the clinical practice of counseling
persons with alcohol and other substance use disorders;
[(d)] 4. Has committed an act in another state, a possession or
territory of the United States or the District of Columbia in
connection with the practice of counseling persons with alcohol and
other substance use disorders or the clinical practice of counseling
persons with alcohol and other substance use disorders that would
be a violation of the provisions of this chapter if the act were
committed in this State; or
-
*SB425*

– 79 –
[(e)] 5. Has failed to comply with any of the requirements for
a license or certificate.
Sec. 121. NRS 641C.455 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.455 1. The Board may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the State
Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants
for the renewal of a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter
through a link on the electronic application for the renewal of a
license or certificate; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license or certificate pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.
Sec. 122. NRS 641C.740 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.740 Each witness who appears by an order of the Board
is entitled to receive for his or her attendance the same fees and
mileage allowed by law to a witness in a civil case. The amount
must be paid by the party who requested the subpoena. If a witness
who has not been required to attend at the request of any party is
subpoenaed by the Board, his or her fees and mileage must be paid
from the money [of the Board.] described in subsection 2 of section
68 of this act.
Sec. 123. NRS 641D.040 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641D.040 “Board” means the Board of [Applied Behavior
Analysis created by NRS 641D.200.] Behavioral Health
Professionals.
Sec. 124. NRS 641D.110 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641D.110 1. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
[1.] (a) A physician who is licensed to practice in this State;
[2.] (b) A person who is licensed to practice dentistry in this
State;
[3.] (c) A person who is licensed as a psychologist pursuant to
chapter 641 of NRS;
-
*SB425*

– 80 –
[4.] (d) A person who is licensed as a marriage and family
therapist or marriage and family therapist intern pursuant to chapter
641A of NRS;
[5.] (e) A person who is licensed as a clinical professional
counselor or clinical professional counselor intern pursuant to
chapter 641A of NRS;
[6.] (f) A person who is licensed to engage in social work
pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
[7.] (g) A person who is licensed as an occupational therapist or
occupational therapy assistant pursuant to chapter 640A of NRS;
[8.] (h) A person who is licensed as a clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, licensed or certified as an alcohol and drug counselor or
certified as an alcohol and drug counselor intern, a clinical alcohol
and drug counselor intern, a problem gambling counselor or a
problem gambling counselor intern, pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
[9.] (i) Any member of the clergy;
[10.] (j) A family member, guardian or caregiver of a recipient
of applied behavior analysis services who performs activities as
directed by a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst; or
[11.] (k) An employee of a school district or charter school
when providing services to a pupil in a public school in a manner
consistent with the duties of his or her position,
 if such a person does not commit an act described in NRS
641D.910 or represent himself or herself as a behavior analyst,
assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior technician.
2. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any license, certificate or registration issued pursuant to
chapters 641 to 641C, inclusive, of NRS;
(b) The adoption of regulations pursuant to chapters 641 to
641C, inclusive, of NRS;
(c) Any investigation or disciplinary proceeding conducted
pursuant to chapters 641 to 641C, inclusive, of NRS; or
(d) Any other activity of the Board conducted pursuant to
chapters 641 to 641C, inclusive, of NRS.
Sec. 125. NRS 641D.250 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641D.250 The Board shall enforce the provisions of this
chapter and may, under the provisions of this chapter:
1. Examine and pass upon the qualifications of applicants for
licensure and registration;
2. License and register qualified applicants;
3. Revoke or suspend licenses and registrations or impose other
disciplinary action; and
-
*SB425*

– 81 –
4. Collect applications and fees [and make disbursements]
pursuant to this chapter . [; and
5. Conduct investigations related to the duties of the Board
under this chapter and take evidence on any matter under inquiry
before the Board.]
Sec. 126. NRS 641D.380 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641D.380 1. The Board shall prescribe, by regulation, fees
for any services provided by the Board pursuant to this chapter and
the following fees, which must not exceed:

Application for licensure as a behavior analyst
or assistant behavior analyst ........................................ $100
Issuance of an initial license as a behavior
analyst or assistant behavior analyst ............................. 450
Biennial renewal or reinstatement of a license as
a behavior analyst .......................................................... 550
Biennial renewal or reinstatement of a license as
an assistant behavioral analyst ...................................... 425
Biennial renewal or reinstatement of a
registration as a registered behavior
technician ...................................................................... 100
Placement of a license on inactive status............................ 100
Biennial review of a license on inactive status ................... 100
Restoration to active status of a license as a
behavior analyst on inactive status if the
restoration occurs during the first year of the
biennium in which the license was issued or
renewed ......................................................................... 300
Restoration to active status of a license as a
behavior analyst on inactive status if the
restoration occurs during the second year of
the biennium in which the license was issued
or renewed ..................................................................... 100
Restoration to active status of a license as an
assistant behavior analyst on inactive status if
the restoration occurs during the first year of
the biennium in which the license was issued
or renewed ..................................................................... 175
Restoration to active status of a license as an
assistant behavior analyst on inactive status if
the restoration occurs during the second year
of the biennium in which the license was
issued or renewed ............................................................ 40
-
*SB425*

– 82 –
Reproduction and mailing of material for an
application ..................................................................... $25
A dishonored check .............................................................. 35
A change of name on a license or registration...................... 25
A duplicate license or registration ........................................ 25
Copies of the provisions of NRS relating to the
practice of applied behavior analysis and the
rules and regulations adopted by the Board .................... 25
Letter of good standing ......................................................... 15
Review and approval of a course or program of
continuing education ....................................................... 25

2. The Board shall ensure, to the extent practicable, that the
amount of such fees is sufficient to pay the costs incurred by the
Board under the provisions of this chapter [,] and, in combination
with the fees imposed pursuant to chapters 641 to 641C, inclusive,
of NRS, the costs incurred by the Board under the provisions of
the chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this act,
including, without limitation, the compensation of the Board
prescribed by [NRS 641D.220,] section 66 of this act, and does not
exceed the amount necessary to pay those costs.
Sec. 127. NRS 644A.880 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
644A.880 1. If the Board determines that a complaint filed
with the Board concerns a matter within the jurisdiction of another
licensing board, the Board shall refer the complaint to the other
licensing board within 5 days after making the determination.
2. The Board may refer a complaint pursuant to subsection 1
orally, electronically or in writing.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 apply to any complaint filed
with the Board, including, without limitation:
(a) A complaint which concerns a person who or entity which is
licensed, certified or otherwise regulated by the Board or by another
licensing board; and
(b) A complaint which concerns a person who or entity which is
licensed, certified or otherwise regulated solely by another licensing
board.
4. The provisions of this section do not prevent the Board from
acting upon a complaint which concerns a matter within the
jurisdiction of the Board regardless of whether the Board refers the
complaint pursuant to subsection 1.
5. The Board or an officer or employee of the Board is immune
from any civil liability for any decision or action taken in good faith
and without malicious intent in carrying out the provisions of this
section.
-
*SB425*

– 83 –
6. As used in this section, “licensing board” means:
(a) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C,
640D, 640E, [641, 641A, 641B, 641C, 641D,] 643 or 654 of NRS
[;] or the chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this
act; and
(b) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 128. NRS 652.126 is hereby amended to read as follows:
652.126 1. The Division may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the
[Department of Health and Human Services] State Office of Health
Care Workforce and Licensing of the Division pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license or
certification pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic
application for the renewal of a license or certification; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license or certification pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certification is
not required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and
is not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certification, for failure to do so.
Sec. 129. NRS 654.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
654.185 1. If the Board determines that a complaint filed
with the Board concerns a matter within the jurisdiction of another
licensing board, the Board shall refer the complaint to the other
licensing board within 5 days after making the determination.
2. The Board may refer a complaint pursuant to subsection 1
orally, electronically or in writing.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 apply to any complaint filed
with the Board, including, without limitation:
(a) A complaint which concerns a person who or entity which is
licensed, certified or otherwise regulated by the Board or by another
licensing board; and
(b) A complaint which concerns a person who or entity which is
licensed, certified or otherwise regulated solely by another licensing
board.
4. The provisions of this section do not prevent the Board from
acting upon a complaint which concerns a matter within the
jurisdiction of the Board regardless of whether the Board refers the
complaint pursuant to subsection 1.
-
*SB425*

– 84 –
5. The Board or an officer or employee of the Board is immune
from any civil liability for any decision or action taken in good faith
and without malicious intent in carrying out the provisions in this
section.
6. As used in this section, “licensing board” means:
(a) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C,
640D, 640E, [641, 641A, 641B, 641C, 641D,] 643 or 644A of NRS
[;] or the chapter consisting of sections 59 to 78, inclusive, of this
act; and
(b) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 130. Section 7 of this act is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 7. The Director of the Office shall:
1. Advise the Director of the Department , [and] the
Administrator and the Board of Behavioral Health
Professionals on matters relating to the health care workforce
in this State.
2. Work in coordination with the Department , [and] the
Division and the Board of Behavioral Health Professionals
to establish criteria and goals for the development and
diversification of the health care workforce in this State.
3. As directed by the Administrator, identify,
recommend and carry out policies related to the health care
workforce in this State.
4. Report periodically to the Administrator concerning
the administration of the policies and programs of the Office.
5. Provide support to the Advisory Council on Graduate
Medical Education created by NRS 223.633 and implement
the Graduate Medical Education Grant Program established
pursuant to NRS 223.637.
6. [Recommend] In consultation with the Board of
Behavioral Health Professionals, recommend to the
Legislature the enactment, amendment or repeal of statutes as
necessary to:
(a) Support an adequate health care workforce to meet the
demand of consumers for behavioral health services and other
health services;
(b) Prevent harm to the health, safety and financial
welfare of the public; and
(c) Remove requirements that are no longer needed to
protect the public or are not effective at improving the
delivery of behavioral health services and other health
services.
-
*SB425*

– 85 –
7. Administer such grants as are provided by legislative
appropriation.
8. Consult with and, within the limits of available
resources, provide assistance to the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada, the University of Nevada School of
Medicine, the Nevada Office of Rural Health, the Area
Health Education Center Program and the Medical Education
Council of Nevada as requested pursuant to NRS 396.898,
396.902, 396.905, 396.906, 396.907 or 396.908.
9. Carry out:
(a) The programs established by NRS 439A.111 to
439A.126, inclusive, for collecting information from certain
providers of health care; and
(b) The Physician Visa Waiver Program established by
NRS 439A.130 to 439A.185, inclusive.
10. Provide support to the Board of Behavioral Health
Professionals.
Sec. 131. 1. The members of the Health Care Workforce
Working Group established by NRS 439A.118 who are currently
serving on July 1, 2025, and who are otherwise qualified to serve as
members of that Working Group on that date may continue to serve
on the Working Group for the remainder of their unexpired terms.
2. The members of the Advisory Council on Graduate Medical
Education created by NRS 223.633 who are currently serving on
July 1, 2025, and who are otherwise qualified to serve as members
of that Council on that date may continue to serve on the Advisory
Council for the remainder of their unexpired terms.
Sec. 132. As used in sections 132 to 141, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 133 to 136, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 133. “Board of Behavioral Health Professionals” means
the Board of Behavioral Health Professionals created within the
Office by section 63 of this act.
Sec. 134. “Director” means the Director of the Office.
Sec. 135. “Division” means the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services.
Sec. 136. “Office” means the State Office of Health Care
Workforce and Licensing established within the Division by section
6 of this act.
Sec. 137. 1. The Division shall:
(a) Develop a plan for transferring the duties of the Board of
Psychological Examiners, the Board of Examiners for Marriage and
Family Therapists and Clinical Professional Counselors, the Board
-
*SB425*

– 86 –
of Examiners for Social Workers, the Board of Examiners for
Alcohol, Drug and Gambling Counselors and the Board of Applied
Behavior Analysis to the Office and the Board of Behavioral Health
Professionals in accordance with the provisions of this act;
(b) On or before October 1, 2025, present the plan at a public
meeting that complies with the provisions of chapter 241 of NRS;
and
(c) On or before January 1, 2026, adopt the plan at a public
meeting that complies with the provisions of chapter 241 of NRS.
2. The plan for the transfer of duties developed pursuant to
subsection 1 is not subject to the provisions of chapter 233B of
NRS.
3. The Director shall notify the Governor, the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, the Board of Psychological Examiners,
the Board of Examiners for Marriage and Family Therapists and
Clinical Professional Counselors, the Board of Examiners for Social
Workers, the Board of Examiners for Alcohol, Drug and Gambling
Counselors and the Board of Applied Behavior Analysis of the date
on which the Office will be prepared to carry out the provisions of
sections 21 to 25, inclusive, 34 to 43, inclusive, 50 to 84, inclusive,
102, 103, 104, 107, 108, 109, 111 to 114, inclusive, 116 to 120,
inclusive, 122 to 127, inclusive, 129, 130, 140, 141 and 146 of this
act. That date must be:
(a) At least 90 days after the Division adopts the plan for the
transfer of duties pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1;
(b) At least 90 days after the Director provides the notice
described in this subsection to each entity listed in this subsection;
and
(c) On or before January 1, 2027.
Sec. 138. On or before the date on which the notice provided
pursuant to subsection 3 of section 137 of this act provides that the
Office will be prepared to carry out the provisions of sections 21 to
25, inclusive, 34 to 43, inclusive, 50 to 84, inclusive, 102, 103, 104,
107, 108, 109, 111 to 114, inclusive, 116 to 120, inclusive, 122 to
127, inclusive, 129, 130, 140, 141 and 146 of this act:
1. The Director shall appoint to the Board of Behavioral Health
Professionals:
(a) One member described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
section 63 of this act, one member described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of section 63 of this act and one member described in
paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of section 63 of this act to initial terms
that begin on January 1, 2027, and expire on December 31, 2027;
(b) One member described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
section 63 of this act, one member described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of section 63 of this act and one member described in
-
*SB425*

– 87 –
paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of section 63 of this act to initial terms
that begin on January 1, 2027, and expire on December 31, 2028;
(c) Two members described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
section 63 of this act and the member described in paragraph (d) of
subsection 2 of section 63 of this act to initial terms that begin on
January 1, 2027, and expire on December 31, 2029; and
(d) Two members described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
section 63 of this act to initial terms that begin on January 1, 2027,
and expire on December 31, 2030.
2. The Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services shall appoint to the Board of Behavioral Health
Professionals the member described in paragraph (e) of subsection 2
of section 63 of this act to an initial term that begins on January 1,
2027, and expires on December 31, 2030.
Sec. 139. Before the date on which the notice provided
pursuant to subsection 3 of section 137 of this act provides that the
Office will be prepared to carry out the provisions of sections 21 to
25, inclusive, 34 to 43, inclusive, 50 to 84, inclusive, 102, 103, 104,
107, 108, 109, 111 to 114, inclusive, 116 to 120, inclusive, 122 to
127, inclusive, 129, 130, 140, 141 and 146 of this act, the Board of
Psychological Examiners, the Board of Examiners for Marriage and
Family Therapists and Clinical Professional Counselors, the Board
of Examiners for Social Workers, the Board of Examiners for
Alcohol, Drug and Gambling Counselors and the Board of Applied
Behavior Analysis shall close each account maintained with a
financial institution by the applicable board pursuant to NRS
641.111, 641A.205, 641B.150, 641C.190 or 641D.230, as
applicable, and pay the closing balance of the account to the State
Treasurer. The assets and liabilities of each such account are
unaffected by the closure and payment. The State Treasurer shall
deposit the money in the State General Fund to the credit of the
Office as soon as practicable on or after January 1, 2027. The Office
shall use the money exclusively for the purposes described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of section 68 of this act.
Sec. 140. As soon as practicable after the effective date of this
section, the Board shall appoint to:
1. The Qualifications and Professional Development Advisory
Committee created by section 71 of this act:
(a) The members described in paragraphs (b), (e) and (h) of
subsection 2 of section 71 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2027;
(b) The members described in paragraphs (c), (f), (i) and (k) of
subsection 2 of section 71 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2028; and
-
*SB425*

– 88 –
(c) The members described in paragraphs (a), (d), (g) and (j) of
subsection 2 of section 71 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2029.
2. The Background and Investigations Advisory Committee
created by section 73 of this act:
(a) The members described in paragraphs (b) and (e) of
subsection 2 of section 73 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2027;
(b) The members described in paragraphs (c) and (f) of
subsection 2 of section 73 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2028; and
(c) The members described in paragraphs (a), (d) and (g) of
subsection 2 of section 73 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2029.
3. The Probation and Compliance Advisory Committee created
by section 75 of this act:
(a) The members described in paragraphs (b) and (e) of
subsection 2 of section 75 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2027;
(b) The members described in paragraphs (c) and (f) of
subsection 2 of section 75 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2028; and
(c) The members described in paragraphs (a) and (d) of
subsection 2 of section 75 of this act to initial terms that begin on
the date of the appointment and expire on December 31, 2029.
Sec. 141. A license, certificate or registration that is valid on
the effective date of this section, and that was issued by the Board of
Psychological Examiners, the Board of Examiners for Marriage and
Family Therapists and Clinical Professional Counselors, the Board
of Examiners for Social Workers, the Board of Examiners for
Alcohol, Drug and Gambling Counselors or the Board of Applied
Behavior Analysis:
1. Shall be deemed to be issued by the Board of Behavioral
Health Professionals; and
2. Remains valid until its date of expiration, if the holder of the
license, certificate or registration, as applicable, otherwise remains
qualified for the issuance or renewal of the license, certificate or
registration, as applicable, on or after the effective date of this
section.
Sec. 142. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer, agency or other entity whose name has been changed or
whose responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the
provisions of this act to another officer, agency or other entity
remain in force until amended by the officer, agency or other entity
-
*SB425*

– 89 –
to which the responsibility for the adoption of the regulations has
been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 143. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 144. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
Sec. 145. NRS 439A.135 and 439A.138 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 146. NRS 641.030, 641.035, 641.040, 641.045, 641.070,
641.080, 641.085, 641.090, 641.1105, 641.111, 641.115, 641.125,
641.135, 641.140, 641.145, 641A.090, 641A.100, 641A.110,
641A.115, 641A.130, 641A.140, 641A.150, 641A.183, 641A.191,
641A.200, 641A.205, 641A.207, 641B.100, 641B.105, 641B.110,
641B.120, 641B.130, 641B.140, 641B.150, 641B.165, 641B.170,
641B.175, 641C.150, 641C.155, 641C.160, 641C.170, 641C.180,
641C.210, 641C.230, 641C.240, 641C.760, 641D.200, 641D.210,
641D.220, 641D.230, 641D.260, 641D.270 and 641D.320 are
hereby repealed.
Sec. 147. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage
and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 20, inclusive, 26 to 33, inclusive, 44 to 49,
inclusive, 85 to 101, inclusive, 105, 106, 110, 115, 121, 128, 131 to
139, inclusive, and 142 to 145, inclusive, of this act become
effective:
-
*SB425*

– 90 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
3. Sections 21 to 25, inclusive, 34 to 43, inclusive, 50 to 84,
inclusive, 102, 103, 104, 107, 108, 109, 111 to 114, inclusive, 116
to 120, inclusive, 122 to 127, inclusive, 129, 130, 140, 141 and 146
of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) For all other purposes, on the date on which the notice
provided pursuant to subsection 3 of section 137 of this act provides
that the State Office of Health Care Workforce and Licensing of the
Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services will be prepared to carry out the
provisions of those sections or January 1, 2027, whichever is earlier.
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
439A.135 “Administrator” defined.
439A.138 “Division” defined.
641.030 Creation; number and appointment of members.
641.035 Terms of members; limitation on consecutive
terms.
641.040 Qualifications of members; conflict of interest.
641.045 Required orientation for new members of Board;
policies concerning compensation and performance review of
staff.
641.070 Meetings; quorum.
641.080 Officers.
641.085 Seal.
641.090 Records: Duties of Secretary-Treasurer; custody
and inspection; confidentiality; exceptions.
641.1105 Board may enter into agreement with Department
of Health and Human Services for certain types of
administrative assistance.
641.111 Deposit and expenditure of money.
641.115 Offices; employees; prohibition on payment of
expenses out of State General Fund.
641.125 Hearings and investigations; taking evidence.
641.135 Civil liability.
-
*SB425*

– 91 –
641.140 Salary of members; per diem allowance and travel
expenses of members and employees; payment of compensation
and expenses of members and employees.
641.145 Annual report to Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services and Chairs of
regional behavioral health policy boards.
641A.090 Creation; number and appointment of members.
641A.100 Qualifications of members; removal for
misconduct.
641A.110 Eligibility for membership.
641A.115 Required orientation for new members of Board;
policies concerning compensation and performance reviews of
staff.
641A.130 Meetings; quorum.
641A.140 Officers.
641A.150 Duties of Secretary-Treasurer.
641A.183 Annual report to Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services and Chairs of
regional behavioral health policy boards.
641A.191 Confidentiality of certain records of Board;
exceptions.
641A.200 Salary of members; per diem allowance and
travel expenses of members and employees; source of payment
of compensation and expenses of members and employees.
641A.205 Deposit and use of money.
641A.207 Board may enter into agreement with
Department of Health and Human Services for certain types of
administrative assistance.
641B.100 Appointment by Governor; qualifications.
641B.105 Required orientation for new members of Board;
policies concerning compensation and performance reviews of
staff.
641B.110 Expiration of term; replacement.
641B.120 Officers; elections; meetings; quorum.
641B.130 List of licensed social workers required to be
maintained by Board.
641B.140 Salary of members; per diem allowance and
travel expenses for members and employees.
641B.150 Payment of expenses; deposit of money;
delegation of authority to hearing officer or panel; claim for
attorney’s fees or costs of investigation.
641B.165 Annual report to Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services and Chairs of
regional behavioral health policy boards.
-
*SB425*

– 92 –
641B.170 Confidentiality of certain records of Board;
exceptions.
641B.175 Board may enter into agreement with
Department of Health and Human Services for certain types of
administrative assistance.
641C.150 Creation; appointment and qualifications of
members; limitations on civil liability.
641C.155 Required orientation for new members of Board;
policies concerning compensation and performance reviews of
staff.
641C.160 Terms of office; removal of members; election of
officers; meetings; limitations on expenses; maintenance of
records; adoption of seal; quorum.
641C.170 Salary of members; per diem allowance and
travel expenses of members and employees.
641C.180 Location of offices; employment of attorneys,
investigators and other persons.
641C.210 Duties of Executive Director.
641C.230 Annual report to Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services and Chairs of
regional behavioral health policy boards.
641C.240 Board may enter into agreement with
Department of Health and Human Services for certain types of
administrative assistance.
641C.760 Confidentiality of certain records of Board;
exceptions.
641D.200 Creation; membership; terms; meetings; officers;
immunity.
641D.210 Required orientation for new members of Board;
policies concerning compensation and performance review of
staff.
641D.220 Salary of members; per diem allowance and
travel expenses of members and employees.
641D.230 Deposit and use of money received by Board.
641D.260 Board authorized to contract to carry out
provisions of chapter.
641D.270 Records: Duties of Board; inspection;
confidentiality of certain records; exceptions.
641D.320 Board prohibited from denying application based
solely on immigration or citizenship status of applicant;
applicant without social security number required to provide
alternative personally identifying number; confidentiality of
number.
H
-
*SB425*